(okay, to be honest, the first six chapters have often been some of my favorite while the last six just make my brains feel like mush because I’m too dumb to understand them all)
The Muchacho Tattoo… My resident Muchacho Artist, Tony Doench has completed my tattoo design, so now I just have to find a time to schedule the session. I’m hoping Jake (the tattoo artist) will let me time lapse the process. Either way, I’ll blog about it.
arrested in a house at the
In fact, Jennifer Lawrence looks incredibly lean and toned. She looks like a young woman who has been working hard to keep her family fed for several years, like someone who could string and draw a bow, bring down prey, skin and clean that prey and haul it back to her home. She looks like someone who could run through the forest for hours if she needed to, and survive cold nights out in the wilderness.
4 Midnight Train
OK, so the last one is a bit odd, but it still makes my point: an extremely pretty gay man who also happens to be the most admired knight in the realm, and who is virtually never bested in tournaments (until he meets the lovely Brienne.) Would a sexist story portray a gay man–much less a pretty one–like that? Hell. No.
- Iggy Pop released 'Skull Ring', including his first new recordings with the Stooges;
After laying around for awhile, my sister suggested a sushi lunch. You don't have to twist my arm to take me out to sushi, so I immediately said yes and jumped in the shower ready to GO!
'The Civil List Pension is an appointment of high honour akin to Order of Merit or Companion of Honour, given for distinguished service to Great Britain in the arts, literature and science,' HM's staff informs me. 'It is paid at the discretion of the Queen and voted in by Parliament.'
ROBESON
Has publicity cost you anything?
I finally said, “I can’t be in this room any longer.” Cely was surprised, but patient. She said we were waiting for the director, but director of what I didn’t learn, because I said, “We’ll see him at the grave.”
I was laughing the entire time making them all.
In the FR cyclopedia of the realms, you get a sketchy view of many kingdoms and different landmarks like bridges and villages. There are many opportunities for adventure and I felt like I wanted to start a campaign there. But, there was that other chapter that felt different. There's in both the cyclopedia and the Waterdeep book a long, really long, list of personalities of realm.
Thanks to Lisa Schroeder, who was the first author I ever emailed back when I was a terrible blogger, and who has been supportive of the blog ever since, to Julia Hoban for being so supportive of the blog and my many projects and being the first author I ever talked to on the phone (I nearly had a panic attack!), to Stephanie Kuehnert who has also been extremely supportive and amazing and also for introducing me to some amazing bands (and writing my favorite book of 2009!), to Melissa Walker and Jennifer Banash because they were two of the first to ever send me books to review, to all the authors I got to meet this year and talk to, including Jennifer Hubbard, Sarah Dessen (I seriously almost passed out because of that one), Laurie Halse Anderson, Laura Weiss, Elizabeth Scott and all the others, because that's really the point of it all, to Josh Berk for helping me with PAYA, to Alexandra Bracken for writing the book I am currently obsessed with - it's books like hers that keep me reviewing - and to all of the authors who ever offered their book to me for review or who I've interviewed, it's so appreciated! Thank you!!
During scouting time, we get to shoot for ourselves. It’s our time. While we have the pressure of making sure our locations are fine, we take the time to feed our own creative juices, some of which may end up in the Instructor Galleries, some not.
that life is truly a circle.
I'm hoping to find a super cheap room in a fully furnished room for 10 weeks and then swiftly move back to our home.
Change your behavior to fit your values: For example, Clara felt guilty because her friend was in the hospital and she didn’t send a card. Her guilt propelled her to buy some beautiful blank cards to make it easier for her to drop a note the next time.
b) Savant i.e. dumb as a box of hair taped up but able to play an oboe in tune
proved ready to stay. And then I
Many Christians will have a hard time finding any positive reasons for sending their children to public school. Even some of the parents who send their kids there will tell you that they wish they could afford to send them to a Christian school or that they had the time to home school them. Many parents blame the public school system for the corruption of society, but how did it get to where it is today?
What a fabulous group of Easel Cards we had on display here for the last two weeks!
Three or four months ago, after several nice blooms, I put my amaryllis plant in the basement. Plants like the amaryllis need a 6 - 8 week "dormant period" in a cool, dark place in order to bloom again. I meant to bring it up months ago, but forgot about it. What a surprise to find this ghostly, anemic shoot coming out of the dessicated bulb! I promptly brought it upstairs and repotted it. New life!
- I still have season finales coming this week and next for Revenge, Grey's Anatomy (but not happy with the direction it was headed. I mean really??) and Glee. I had mixed feelings with the finale of How I Met Your Mother and I don't want to spoil it for anyone who has yet to watch it but let's just say I was extremely happy to see the very last scene play out the way it did and I think it sets things up for a great season next year.
Even though I can’t have her!
ACFN is disappointed the Supreme court of Canada does not deem this issue of national interest and they stand by their stance that Alberta tenure system needs to be reviewed and amended to include the constitutionally protected rights of First Nations at the early stages of granting leases.
i'm happy i have this blog
The organizations for which we work are based on an election procedure, meaning that if the incumbent is not voted in for another term, we will pretty much lose our jobs. Scott's boss was up for reelection last month, and surprisingly he wasn't able to win in the first round of voting with the required 50% plus 1. So a runoff was held...and thankfully, he won!!!
I like working from home because I can put in an extra long work out, no matter how late I get out of bed. Yesterday I slept until 9 and worked out for around 45 minutes.
I know-- you're wondering why I didn't just cut short the martyr act and go to the doctor. Well, here's the kicker (the thing that's going to make all of you want to throw things at me): I'm the only one in the family that doesn't have health insurance.
Ravens flit and gray wolves prowl:
If you’ve come to find out how to make someone you love love you back, well, you’ve come to the exact WRONG place for all that. Cuz I sure as heck don’t know! I have certainly had all the worst experiences chasing after someone who would rather be boiled alive in a vat of dead skunk organs than spend time with me, and yet, somehow this is appealing to my soul…
Surprisingly to some, this scenario isn’t a hypothetical about Obama, but is a recounting of Reagan’s first two years in office.
So go run to your closet and search through what your drawn to. Is it neutrals, a favorite color, animal print? Let that be a starting point to design your room around.
Not too shabby huh? =)
Isn't Michelle's card just the cutest!?! If one of your New Year's resolutions is to get one of your projects published, check out the current calls list and submit your creations for the next issue!
in a Christian church where they took shelter... Obama SUPPORTED his cousin
Earlier tonight, Vince McMahon entered the building in a limo with John Laurentius and a lawyer to give CM Punk one more chance to sign a contract.
Why are website visitors important? Because more visitors mean more people to convert to leads and sales. Better imaging of your brand.
(I want to say something here about the common conception of diagnostic entities as somehow discrete and "immutable" natural categories, whereas in fact their existence is dependent on human identification and description, and therefore culture-bound, but don't seem to be able to express it in a way that doesn't sound more postmodernist/relativist than i'm happy with... maybe in another post...)
i know it's been AWHILE since I've been here - life has had it's challenges with me and I'm just getting to put all my ducks in a row now - FINALLY - still a lot to work on and accomplish - but things are looking up-up-and away!
“We estimate that reef shark numbers have dropped substantially around populated islands, generally by more than 90% compared to those at the most untouched reefs,” said lead author Marc Nadon from the Joint Institute for Marine and Atmospheric Research at the University of Hawaii.
When I log into WordPress.com, I always check the Freshly Pressed tab thing and see if any titles catch my eye. Sometimes there is none. Sometimes there’s one. Or sometimes on occasion there will be three or four that sound interesting. Well this Freshly Pressed post caught my eye cause it was about letters. A letter to her past self. Her younger self. I thought that was interesting because it reminded me of a song that I love.
How did everyone's menu plan go last week? Did you stick to your plan? I find that sometimes when I plan specific meals for specific days I have a difficult time sticking with the plan, but it went really well this week. I really loved being able to decide what I wanted to make for dinner each day knowing that I had everything on hand for a variety of meals.
So make sure you have the 7th August marked in your diaries 9:00 a.m. UK time for our very 1st challenge, we would love to see you all. Are you as excited as we are?
Wouldn't you love to make this beauty for someone special? Or a whole dozen?! Now you can! I have put together a detailed tutorial on how make each of these stunning roses. The tutorial is in three parts. Each tutorial gives clear step-by-step instructions with tons of gorgeous photos on how to make the roses, stems, calyces, and leaves. The complete tutorial is 13 pages in length and has 43 photos. The flowers are not difficult to make, but a lot of photos are required to give complete step-by-step instruction. It also gives lots of instruction on how to create the subtle effects that really make these flowers look real and come to life.
Allen 2:15 Jack 3:10
When Collins took the job they talked about his spotless track record when it comes to turning teams around in his first season and they were not kidding. Collins has taken a team that had little identity on either side of the ball and turned them into a team that plays staunch defense on one end while running the ball beautifully in transition while also developing a solid half court strategy as well.
I am definitely not anywhere near ready for a relationship with some guy who requires me to know how he likes his coffee in the morning or what he likes to eat for breakfast. Hell, I won’t even remember his name in the morning let alone where the kitchen is.
After thinking about this a bit, the tricky, complex-sounding guitar riff of the original version of this song by Led Zeppelin, which evokes visual synaesthesia of the tortuous, twisted lines goes well with the theme in the lyrics of the song. The lyrics describe a difficult, dangerous journey that could well fail. In contrast the version of this song by Tool has this guitar riff played to sound powerful and with timing that sounds dramatic rather than fiddly and difficult. In my opinion the way this riff is played in the Tool version is a mindless default to the standard powerful and dramatic heavy metal sound. Unfortunately, this is at odds with the theme in the lyrics of this song, and overall, the Tool version tells an entirely different story, a story that has already been told countless times before. I wish Tool hadn’t bothered.
Cut bacon strips in half, wrap scallop in bacon half and hold in place with toothpicks. Set aside.
Black Friday: Don’t Buy Your Sweater Off the Back of the Poor (Nov. 24): Every holiday season I become more disgusted at the reprehensible “special sales” that start at 4:00 a.m. (or earlier). What horrific consumerism and abuse of workers! Last Thanksgiving I had a platform to voice my dismay in this post.
You needed to learn/figure out more and more into the depth no matter how big the scope is. But once you master the subject, how/what do you think? If you learned swimming to stay afloat, does it really concern how deep the pool is?
And while I would like to follow along with this Minnesota Nice mentality, a sizable part of me says, no. Fuck that shit. Pardon my Anglo-Saxon, but I and other trans* folk are far too aware of the silence, ignorance, and general misinformation surrounding trans* issues and identity. And so to this, I try very hard to say a loud and resounding, no!
I said I'd do this....I'm in a MUCH better mood today, so here goes....
Today she’s still on a drip and Police are investigating.
But now a days, going backwards is rarely a good thing. In fact on many occasions, when I feel like I'm slipping backwards it's incredibly frustrating.
Before I enter the last chapter of this series, which is already written and deals with the “rich man who went away sad” because he wanted to follow in Jesus footsteps but couldn’t give up his possession I will ease into the subject matter with a down to earth story.
Addy’s role as an injury lawyer becomes hazier by the second, but she decides to do whatever it takes to serve up some justice – even if it’s after the jury is long gone.
Painter shut out Roseburg in the top of the sixth, but was pulled in the seventh after giving up a ground-rule double to Conner Kahle. The hit by Kahle was the first of seven straight Indians to reach base in the final inning. Kahle scored on an RBI single by Connor Newell, who advanced to third on an error by right fielder Sebastian Reynolds.
Especially the Mondays where the subject spawned written posts.
As you tumble out of the boat for a swim -
What do the deniers say about this? “The world’s temperature rose about half a degree centigrade during the last quarter of the 20th century,” writes Nigel Lawson, “but even the Hadley Centre for Climate Prediction and Research… has now conceded that recorded temperature figures for the first seven years of the 21st century reveal there has been a standstill.”
Favorite Character(s):
I didn't make it to the dramatic presentation. I transposed two theaters when I was looking at directions originally and when I realized the mix-up it was too late to make the show. Oh well, there will be other opportunities. I'll just have to stay on top of what's playing and plan ahead. What I like about Houston is that classic and contemporary, much-lauded works get mounted here. Quite different from Austin.
It's a similar grain bill to my Best Bitter but I've added some Pale Chocolate malt to add another dimension. I originally got the Pale Chocolate malt for the Black Sheep Riggwelter clone and am quite impressed with the flavour it brings to the party.
Where did the days and weeks go? As we did school today and I helped with word problems and verb conjugations, studied caverns and mapped Ohio, explained binary compounds and listened to piano practice and readings, the time seemed to go so slowly. It didn't drag and it certainly wasn't boring. (Unless you count the three loads of laundry. They were relatively boring.) Yet I know that I'll blink and it will be Saturday.
'The Power of Now'
Komodos eat 80% of their body weight in a single meal. Time for some math: What is 80% of 150 (pounds)? 120 (pounds) I think. That means the Komodo Dragon could eat my entire body at one sitting–and still be hungry! Watch out!
Rayloth chuckled and turned to head toward the cockpit. “You’re going to wish you hadn’t by the time we leave,” he said, smiling. “And that’s if our investigation doesn’t turn up anything.”
The Anna Lindh Foundation was founded by the Arab League, the EU, the European Council and UNESCO. Traugott Schoefthaler, head of the Anna Lindh Foundation, said: “We will arrange giant Muslim Youth Festivals — like the ‘Images of the Middle East’, which lasted six weeks in 2006 in Denmark.
Painted blades black.
Some of you probably hate a capella music, but I guess you just won’t listen to it. And it’s not like I was in the vocal group so I won’t be offended if you think it’s rather dumb.
This pregnancy has been no different than when I was pregnant with Mia. I feel like shit all of the time and I constantly puke! Pretty soon I'm going to lose all my hair and teeth and be the most attractive lady in all the universe! Hey...at least I'll have an amazing new home that I can hide in!
I know you are not supposed to look at those typical charts, but I do. I do not look at them and think "oh, if only she were typical and doing these things." I use them as a tool. I want to know what her peers are achieving so I can set goals for her. Yes, I remember her time frame is different but I need a point of reference so I can decide where we need to go and what we need to be doing to get there. I brought these goals to the speech therapist, and it was so helpful. She went through them with me. The speech therapist also did a language evaluation on Kristen. It was so helpful as well because it gave us an idea of what she needs to work on.
Sir Topham Hat…got hooked up here by another guy that I think felt bad for me and let us sneak in to have the very last picture allowed with Mr. Hat. What you cant see is the high five charade that took place as soon as they were allowed to run up on the stage…then the group bear hug after the pictures were taken. Greatness!
i'm already supposed to be in two different places this weekend, but i am hoping to squeeze a quick trip to bijou in. maybe i will see you there? please come say hi if i do!
Once you knew they would slide on down.
Pour the batter over the apple mixture. (At this point, I realized I forgot to add the cinnamon. On a whim, I sprinkled the cinnamon over the batter and crossed my fingers.) Bake at 450F for about 20 minutes, or until golden brown.
“Whoa,” says the little girl with a touch of awe.
There are times when we must demand that our entire being find that place of worship. David told his soul what to do, then he repeated the message to his soul and reminded himself that God was worthy of this high level praise. Forget not all of his benefits – David deemed it important that his entire being recognize God for all that He is and all that He has done. When organizing the inner also make sure that (all that is within) the mind and body also follow along and agree when it’s time to worship.
I had heard about this on the BA boards, but had not seen it confirmed anywhere. Here it is from the horse's mouth. No word on Austin.
One final request please. We are struggling for illustrators; Steven Franklin is doing very well, but we don’t want to overwork him! Our other illustrator, Wayne, is off line at the moment due to his PC being rebuilt. So, if anyone would like to send us an example of their work we would be happy to consider it. If we like it we would be delighted to include it in the book alongside the originals, but we cannot, unfortunately, pay people. However, we hope that the opportunity of getting some work into the books, with - of course - our recommendations will suffice.
We have more in common than what we don’t have in common. But you cannot get to that understanding when you “other” people. When you cause that separation, it is hard to see what glues us together. And that is exactly what Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr. fought against during the Civil Rights Movement.
Snack: protein shake
My photo inspired me to try out my gouache again and see if I could capture the panorama on paper. I got out some watercolor paper and did this 5″ x 7″ painting. I’ll admit I struggled with the clouds; haven’t painted many of them. I did lighten up the foreground too, cuz I have an artistic license. I love the sandy looks of the mountains, and the green tinted flat areas. The desert is such a vast place of subtle beauty and I tried to bring that out in this painting.
One of the things we can do to make it easier on our struggling soul is to keep seeking knowledge …. go to religious classes, ask questions when in doubt and be in the companies of those who share the same path, the same mission in life.
But these kids don't have a choice.
I’m not looking to start any conflict with users or owners of the site/service either. The purpose here is to alert legitimate PayPal users as to the risks involved as well as the utter dishonesty and hypocrisy when it comes to PayPal, their policies, practices etc.
I watch them grow
10. Go back to your bard friend who says all that sounds too hard and gives up on sailing. He says he will give you the compass, but wants some sheets of music in return. this will be covered in another quest.
Here’s the blog where I finally break the internet by holding the mirror up to the mirror.
He checks my homework
A friend took the photo of me right before I left to meet him.
ANYWAYS...none the less...Mr Curious response is always the same thing...he thinks I over look things and it is sometimes in my head. For example, if I decide to go to the doctors for a headache, and by chance my doctor will say well you know you might need glasses or its your jaw that can be causing these pains - check your eyes and if thats not it we will see what else. When I leave and update this to mr curious, he response is 'you dont need to go to the doctors for that - you could have just asked mr.curious'. When I mention anything about not feeling well, he DIAGNOSES me as if he has gone to med school and has some sort of credential. IT DRIVES ME CRAZY..and he knows it.....which makes him want to do it more... as I am typing this out, I can literally hear him say 'do you need dr. curious advice?' My response never changes..........'YOUR NOT A DOCTOR'
Because what Hill does well is keep things running on the bridge. That’s her real role, it seems. She’s the liaison between Fury and the Helicarrier; she keeps everything running while Fury is pondering bigger questions, but she always has an ear on what’s going on with Fury and the Avengers.
On the happy end of things, my proctors, campus security guys, shuttle drivers, and most people I keep running into outside of school have been stellar to me this past week and I really appreciate it. I hope my non-overbearing, not mean, and not hurry-up-and-rush-because-I’m-important-mentality has made their day a little better too compared to some of the New York and New Jersey folks. I will defend my Massachusetts people and yes, one person can save the whole state.
3. Enjoy barroom antics- At this point, you should probably leave “sick” for the day before you get fired. But since you shouldn’t drive anywhere, just walk over to the local T.G.I. Friday’s (everyone has one). Serving shitfaced patrons at noon is not uncommon there, so you can blend right in. It’ll most likely be college kids, but you can be the cool old guy/gal. Do things Doc would do to impress them- 1. Say fancy words like Huckleberry and cosmopolitan. 2. Do coin tricks. 3. Twirl a shot glass (but save this for the end, because they don’t make tin ones with handles anymore, and you’ll most likely shatter it).
But this is not it! I am not done with Paris, and I am not done with this blog. Oui, I will be posting again. Soon. So stay tuned—it might take me awhile to resurface but as we all know now: Paris is in my blood. I will be back.
o Invest in their strengths and competencies (i.e. increase them)
BUILT-IN HDMI TERMINAL
Uncle Ted is very outspoken (rightfully so) on this important right, and the liberal threat to it.
A foul beast emerges from this barrow every evening during the dark of the moon, she claims, and she will believe the truth of their story only if they can slay it, or cause it to flee. She will be unable to describe it, but will say that it eats people and leaves few footprints when it travels. It never enters houses, so people shelter from it in the mead hall, but it often kills passers-by and livestock. If the characters ask, she will agree to pay damages for their injuries in battle against the beast, even as a chieftain would, so long as they prove their innocence of her charge.
Sarcasm is a form of communication that heavily relies on vocal intonation and context in order that it has a humorous, satirical, or ironic effect on the listener. Humor, satire, and irony may incorporate sarcasm, but the message’s receiver would have to be in on the joke AND think it is funny AND not feel hurt (or feel the anger that “covers up” hurt). Sarcastic “humor” is the velvet glove that covers the iron fist of rudeness and hostility when there isn’t that shared understanding between the speaker and listener. Absent BOTH sides SHARING the laugh, sarcastic remarks are better classified under the heading of “unfunny, mean-spirited, denigration, or even (as we have all seen) drunken, ignorant” remarks.
Now, for the first time in the series, they’ve decided to go with online MMORPG. Like the 11th and 14th Final Fantasy series, there will be online only with a monthly subscription fee. But they have announced that there will be a “kids time” where users can play for free.
It’s true I sort of resent the bento moms with their wacky lunch boxes filled with cartoon characters made of bread, marshmallows and sliced ham. But in the generous spirit of this still-fresh new year, I have to admit I also kind of admire the insane dedication and creative impulse. Now an American graphic designer has upped the ante with her tumblr blog, Lunch Box Awesome, and a commitment to making her kid a new cartoon bento EVERY DAY this school year.
Alone and free
Boston, 13th and 14th
green with graffiti.
I have been carrying you in both my belly and my heart for the past 33 weeks. Wondering who you will look like, about your personality and your place in our growing family. There are still moments, some days, where I don't feel very pregnant, likely lost in the daily toddler mama activities, work and household duties. But, you are quick to give me at least hourly reminders that you are with me and growing big and strong. You are on the move near constantly these days. Rolling, kicking, pushing out. Watching you move in my belly has become my favorite source of entertainment in quiet moments.
Having her down the hall, or in my arms, or even near me in any way made everything better.
Winners will be selected via random draw, and will notified by e-mail.
Talking of smooth and creamy – Cheesecake is something I associate with Americans. I not really sure why, but I suppose there are a multitude of voluptuous American cheesecake recipes and it is a bit of a US classic along with apple pie. I made one at the weekend as we had an old friend of the family visiting. He lives near Seattle.
This Friday we had our first very real emergency. There was nothing I could have done to prevent it, and I did everything in my power to stop it. I know that. I’m proud of the fact that my baby is still alive and healthy and that I stayed calm in the scariest moment I’ve ever faced. But now that the snow storm has settled in my glass bubble, the emergency long forgotten in her mind, I feel like my pieces of courage will never quite fit together the same, they’ll never again be that solid brick of mama invincibility again without little holes of fear of another emergency looming just under the surface. This Friday shook me back to reality and smacked me in the forehead with the reminder that even if you do everything right, life is fragile and anything can happen in an instant.
Thank you friends for all your kind words yesterday on my Rough Day post. They really encouraged me. Thank you so much! Yesterday (Friday) was still a little rough but today and been so much better. It's amazing how sleep can make things better!
At Mattins the lessons in the first nocturn are Fidelis sermo, taken from the Common of Confessor Bishops. In the third nocturn the ninth lesson is a homily for the Vigil (its three lessons may be read as one)from St. Augustine. The Te Deum is sung. At Lauds a commemoration of the Vigil is sung (the antiphon on the Benedictus is proper but the prayer is of the preceding Sunday) and the Commemoration of the Cross is sung.
I have been wanting to create a Cousin book for some time now to assemble photos from all of the events my son and his cousin have shared together over these 4 years. When Snapfish offered their “buy 1 get 2 free” deal, I knew this was my opportunity. Though I knew I wanted to create a cousin-themed digital album, I was unsure of how the book would flow…
Now, we have one more image released this week as well. I really wanted to make a card with this one too. It’s such a beautiful I butterfly! Love the combo of butterflies and music. It makes my heart sings!!!
Even the once world leading NHS is broken and killing, both by design and my neglect, possibly hundreds of thousands of people a year. In 2008, 6,000 women gave birth in corridors, lifts and taxis, when lack of beds and doctors forced them away at the last minutes before birth. A new report, just out, but apparently in the hands of the elites for over half a year, shows that some 50,000 or more a year are dying from direct neglect in the hospital systems, and this is even without the Satanic Pathway in effect. What is the Pathway? Why the Pathway to Dignified Death, where they take sick or sickly elderly and not so elderly, pump them full of morphine and allow them to starve and dehydrate to death. The evil of such as system and the fact that the British tolerate it and have not risen past indignation, and tore themselves away from junk TV to demand better shows how befitting of total collapse British society is.
So when in the Chi and looking for a place to party and hang out have a good time enjoy some great drinks, stop by Vibe(1543 N. Kingsbury) and visit Erendida. I'm very sure, considering how passionate she is about the industry, and the fact that she truly enjoys being a bartender, you will not be disappointed!!
Deborah, send me your address
All day/night alone.
But most importantly… I trust in Peter Jackson. I may have almost hated The Lovely Bones in every way possible, but that didn’t make me doubt him. Yes, I have no problem switching off King Kong during certain scenes (but partly because I’m worried I’ll become all teary and snotty, and end up as embarrassed as I did after Marley & Me). No problem. Why? Because of The Lord of the Rings.
Would you say the same old story
2 tsp finely chopped green chillies
The full essay can be found in The Best Australian Essays - a 10-Year Collection, published by Black Inc, ISBN: 9781863955232.
They also aren't discussing wheelchair yet - which doesn't matter because I have already ordered it and it will arrive next week - but still...isn't it time for independence? I didn't even bring it up. But again - I think, holding off on equipment until kids are older and bigger, which allows the equipment to last longer and also simply creating a standard for everyone instead of looking at individuals.
On January 18th of this year, just after midnight I started feeling my first rushes. Initially, I didn't think much of them. Even though I was "overdue" I really thought I feel a few rushes, go to sleep and wake up the next day still pregnant, ready to go about my day. Part of that was true.
Honour and praise to the Love made flesh, who came to give himself to us!
Lots of you have been absolute stars in visiting fellow entrant's blogs and getting to know our challenge community. We would urge you to continue to spend a little time doing this and even if it's only 10 visits, you would be making 10 people very happy! In order to save time and make commenting easier for those wonderful people who have commented on SO many blogs...
9. I CAN be a nice teacher on Wednesday nights
Although the front of the iPhone 5 will look about the same, the back will feature a flat, metal panel stretching from beneath the camera to nearly the bottom. iLounge’s sources did not say why the device might come with that additional element. Aside from the metal panel, the device will boast Gorilla Glass 2 technology, according to the site’s source.
I guess I've always had a liking for ladies with green skin since Star Trek....
It is one of three, in a mini collection called 49th Parallel, for July Calendar Girls.
Here's a closer view of my Copic-filled image . . .
Well, as it is always said: there is more than one way to skin a cat… This, ladies and gentlemen, is not the end of it. Suffice it to say Angela has not lost her champions. She has suffered and endured enough hardship - and enough is enough.
If I would have to pick a few things it would be: Learn, be available and try. First be a learner. Study, pray, seek God for wisdom. Find others that are doing the gift. Intern with someone. Be a student and seek God’s guidance and instruction. Second, be available. God uses these gifts for His purposes. He will direct your path. It is all about Him and His love for mankind. Go where He is working and He will show you what to do. Third, try. I could say, “Just Do it!” but often the “doing” doesn’t happen. You are still using your gift when God asks you to pray for healing and the person doesn’t get healed! God is the healer and His ways are beyond our understanding. But I do know this, it seems that most things in life are a process. God is committed to process and seeing these gifts grow and be used is a process. We are called to be obedient to His leading. He will act according to His will. And you know what? Things will begin to happen. Elisha watched and tutored under Elijah, Timothy under Paul, the disciples under Jesus. I really believe that we will know more and more and see more and more happen as we do more and more.
Leave in the tray to cool before cutting into slices and enjoy.
Hello all, sorry for my general lack of interaction in the blogosphere lately. I've been feeling a little run down (but feeling much better now) and also my one day a week working gig has taken up a bit of my crafting/blogging time! All good though- I'm enjoying dipping my toes back in the working world for a little while.
Now off you go to hop around the blogosphere and see all the Perfect Picture Books posted today. PPB bloggers, please add your post-specific link to the list below.
Fresh bottle: I didn't get too much aromas to begin with, it was served a little too cold, but I did get a big dose of aniseed, gooseberry and watermelon. From the first taste you can tell it's boozy. It's like someone's shoved a spade full of brown sugar in your mouth and set it on fire! There's tonnes of pure hop resin and a super orange bitterness which is kind of like a cointreau spirit flavour. It's sweet sweet caramel with an almost medicinal oaky character behind loads of toffee. Think Imperial IPA meets Quad Barley Wine.
Becoming a parent only sharpened my realisation of that fact. Perhaps parents will be the workers who humanise the workplace for everyone. After all, the problem is not children, the problem is the tyranny of workplaces that behave like you are theirs 24/7.
And for what?
Perhaps the best sign of real progress along the yogic path is equanimity, peace of mind and steadiness of awareness. Consistency in practice even if we don’t have any experiences is important. If we give up our practices after an experience, often that experience will not bear fruit.
I thought Luke did a really good job, but being one who can never leave well enough alone (at least that's what Adam would say...wink wink) I just had to work on it. After all, everyone has their own style and I thought painting the black trim white would really give the house a fresh, welcoming look.
Mrs. Donaldson had a smile that was bright and at times appeared to beam lights that radiated to all who encountered her space. As our class prepared to take on daily life and living, we could count on Mrs. Donaldson to give us words of encouragement to take us throughout our day. A Jewel, because she saw the best in her students, a Gift to Teaching because she stayed present in our lives that was who Mrs. Donaldson was each and everyday.
If anything, to do the 10k
The farmer said, "You can't raffle off a dead horse."
I started this place a little over a year ago just for me. It was like a visual journal to document my homeschooling ups and downs. A place to process, pat myself on the back when things go well or vent when things go not so well. I feel like I'm learning so much too and I want to be able to write about it.
back in early november, after the first frost. it was the last day at the garden. many communal gardeners had long stopped coming, and it seemed as if the vast field was eagerly claiming back its ground after the last romantic urban part-time agrarophiles had finally gone home.
What is the relationship of the Holy Spirit with the believer today under this dispensation of the grace of God? Is He merely along side? Is He but a companion, who never leaves us or forsakes us? No, it is much better than that.
Good morning everyone and a Happy New Year to you all. I hope that you all had a wonderful Christmas and received loads of crafting goodies from Santa.
My parents live in a small desert community – it is calm and quiet without much traffic – foot or vehicular. But it does have heat in abundance, and lots of places to lie down by the side of the road and quietly die of dehydration. Near their house is a flat, paved road which goes for about 30 miles until it becomes very rough, loose dirt. If I find the time, I may forego the comfort of a good seat and try this out, just to keep moving.
Xbox 360 Controller Review (xbox360controllerreview.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
So, between that and more than a handful of Beer Dinners I've been hosting at various venues and the new venues wanting to get on board and do dinners I've been writing menus and trivia questions and tasting notes and matching suggestions and whatever else. No excuse for not writing heaps here, but there's your reason! I think that's about it. What else ...? Hmmm?
To sit on the floor
us if we opened the door. If I barked they would
Send Submissions To:
I believe there remains just one reason why we still have print newspapers: So men have something to take to the toilet and toss on the floor when they’re done.
If you need anything while in Japan you’ll find it at one of the country’s Don Quijote stores.
Krik, Krak by Edwidge Danticat: I discovered this collection of short stories during one of my Undergrad courses that I considered crucial to the development of my adult self. Krik, Krak is striking. One of the most well written collections I've ever read! Beautiful tales of Haitian life, dealing with trauma, love, and self discovery. It really caused me to understand the beauty of being a woman of color, and the beauty of talent in our communities.
Sketchbook drawing: Drawn first with fountain pen followed by Peerless Watercolor Papers using a waterbrush.
“Care workers like Khalil, and his colleagues in dangerous places all over the world, should be allowed to work free from threats of abduction and violence.”
“Good night, Bernard.”
Eventually, drained of memories, my old lady rose and shuffled towards the exit, giving me that special Venetian upside-down wave by which the hand becomes a castanet. I waved her goodbye.
Lamb House later became the home of E F Benson and Rumer Godden. Benson immortalised Rye in his Mapp and Lucia novels, renaming the house "Mallards".
Status Anxiety is a book penned by the modern philosopher - Alain De Botton. I actually emailed Alain a link to this blog which he read and emailed saying he had read or was in the midst of reading. Thank you for that Alain. Here is his main premise (care of wikipedia):
- Miss Libby also errantly thinks she can sneak over to the neighbors for treats, visits or attention at will though she gets a very stern reprimand ;-)
Hopefully you’ll enjoy this stark, serious form of musical expression. I feel it’s some of the most direct communication music has ever made me experience and I recommend using headphones, because it begs to be listened to at really quite loud volumes. Sometimes I get the feeling the record is actually shy, feeling distant unless you push it a bit, unless you force it to take over the room. And then it crackles with electricity and heat. That’s it from me, time to get immersed in this musical medicinal alcohol…
When does this government tell the truth?
I never got it.
Alicia, who is staying in Mauritius for nine months to visit a friend, adopted two stray dogs — whom she called Mira and Wanda — on the waterfront near Riv du Rempart in the north-east.
Tammie
Recently a store called Falk Surgical Supplies opened up on the southwest corner of 64th and 1st in a building that was sitting empty for what seemed like a couple of years. From 1966-88, that building was Maxwell's Plum, a flashily decorated bar and restaurant which followed T.G.I. Friday's one block south, opened the previous year, as the first-ever singles bars, where young, single twenty-somethings can meet and mingle. Before these places opened up, bars were strickly old-man hangouts. Places like P.J. Clarke's and McSorley's were not for schmoozing. Opening up a place for young people to socialize was a new concept in the '60s, which is hard to believe because now there's a singles bar on practically every block in the city.
True, it's technically a mess. It's randomly punctuated. The dialogue is all over the place. The characters are bipolar. The sex is vanilla. Typos abound (at one point Christian stared at Ana like "a bacon in the night" which made a weird sort of sense, actually). Ana has this really weird habit of doing figure skating jumps off gymnastics apparatuses. And it started out as fanfic, which I get the impression I'm supposed to be all up in arms about. But holy cow. Do you know the last time I read that many words in such a short period of time? Harry Potter and the Order of the Phoenix.
Arriving at noon at the studio on rue Cevennes in the 15e arrondissement, I joined a large buzzing crowd mingling under umbrellas outside the entrance. I was evidently the only American in the group. They were an animated bunch -- perhaps about 90 in all. A calm teacher from Toulouse corralling 23 students. Three couples from Switzerland. Lyon, Montpelier, Rennes. Wow. It seemed that people from all over France had come just for the show, and I had simply stumbled in on a whim from the arrondissement next door. The doors opened and slowly we filed down the corridor. After taking our names and stashing our pieces of identity in a lock-box, they had us sign release forms. "I promise to abide by the rules, to remain in my seat and not make any unnecessary movements or noises during the recording, etc. etc."
I really wanted to have something I could wear that was special and meant something to me without the whole crazy lady thing going on. I kept thinking that I could create a charm necklace after all as a Stella & Dot Stylist I do sell them. But it just never felt right so I didn't place the order.
2 Slices
3. Now if I could just hear back from Tor (with an affirmative) everything would be just dandy.
I remember when I was a kid the coolest costumes were the cheap plastic masks with a stretchy string stapled to them so they would stay on. My favorite costume as a child would have to be Spider Man. As an adult, I have to admit I loved dressing up for the evening as a woman. I used to have a collection of dresses and wigs! A little make-up here and there to get the look just right…and I always had my hairy legs prominently displayed! After the night was over, I just threw the wigs in a tote so every year the wigs became more tangled and wilder looking. I looked crazier and crazier as the years went by. I could have passed for a zombie toward the end of my dressing up as woman phase. I’m not sure what that says about me but it was fun!
(right click on image, copy and paste to your favorite publishing program and print)
“Elk City.”
The chart next clearly demonstrates that the accumulated money was then being passed straight from Barnes into an account in Zurich in the name of Musa Aman, UBS A/C 230-75069201.
Pakiam pointed out his fear that “the decision not to prosecute appears to legitimise the actions of the Al-Islam journalists”. He added he believed that the Catholic community will be “satisfied” if the journalists and publisher apologise.
With more time we thought it would be interesting to explore the differences in attitude towards RA students between people from the inner city and those living on the outskirts of the city. Additionally it would be interesting to find out if there is a difference in perception between younger and older people in middelburg. While some data was collected related to this a more comprehensive study may have reveal more interesting differences.
So...since it's Friday, what are you planning for the weekend? We're going to work in the yard some more and celebrate my grandma's 87th birthday. We've been pruning trees and cleaning/raking our landscaping (or lack there of) in hopes of getting a jump on Spring. I'm hoping to actually have time to have more flowers and a bigger garden this year. Cross your fingers for us!
Even had time to make a page between taking naps and checking the content of the fridge. It's for the 15 December challenge over at UOAS.
cooked chicken,shredded
It also signals a transition in your life,new opportunities and/or changes.
I am reminded of the Kimya Dawson lyrics Jess has on his blog, "So write and write and keep on writing, Just make sure your life's exciting." A few days ago I was thinking that my life wasn't all that exciting. How wrong I was. We are living the grand adventure of following our passions. It doesn't get more exciting than that!
“We still have lot to learn about how organisms will respond to climate change,” Hellmann said. “Our study shows significant biological effects of climate change, but it also shows that organisms can partially adjust their physiology to compensate. We now need to discover if other species adjust in similar ways to our example species.”
But these same enthusiasts have deemed it entirely suitable to enjoy the contents of a bottle or can if properly decanted into an appropriate glass. Moreover, some times the very fact of a beer being bottle conditioned, or naturally carbonated in the bottle, is exalted as ideal and preferred. Even so, most cans apart from those with a nitro widget (Guinness, Boddington’s) generally have remained objects of suspicion.
We finally finished Trumpet of the Swan and loved it through and through. It was such a lovely story with both a silly and gentle sense of humor and a kind soul. Last night we started Little House in the Big Woods. After hearing so many of my Yarn Along companions talk about the Little House series over these past winter months, when asked by my mom what we would like her to send our little people for Valentine’s Day this year I suggested she get us this treasured series. (It can be tricky sending gifts to a family in the throws of a serious and intentional downsize. Thanks, Mom!) I remember reading all of these books as a young girl and am excited to share these stories with my little ones. They are timeless tales of struggle and joy and family and childhood. Good stuff, these books.
Where do you see Frumble Fabrics going in the next year?
I don't want this to be about "dieting" or "weight loss" or any of those things, because in my heart I know that each of us can use this as a "fill in the blank" sort of post. It works for "not raising your voice to the kids", "not nagging your husband", and "not spending as much money" just as well as it does "take control of your health". Hmmmm....I guess it's safe to say that all of those aforementioned subjects are things that God has asked me to deal with.
(Music: Forget About It-All Time Low, Get Back Up-TobyMac, Six Feet Under The Stars-All Time Low, Small-JJ Heller, Mood Rings-Relient K, No Heros Allowed-Mayday Parade, Our Song-The Spill Canvas, The Story of Us-Taylor Swift, Oh! Darlin’-Autm)
My advice is as follows:
1 inch fresh ginger, cut into 1/4" slices - next time, I would use more
The gentleman did not give a satisfactory answer. But Shankar received an answer one night the very first week.
drinking coffee
Good Morning and Happy Sunday! It's still hot and humid, but we awoke to thunder, lightening and pouring rain once again this morning. Hopefully, it will clear up soon so that we
Then I didn’t hear from him for forty-eight hours and … then came to find out that he wasn’t even working, he was at the pub with his friends.
Someone will get captured somewhere in there, and someone else will die, Gabby will pull someone else into the ground halfway and spit them out, and someone else will come out with a joke that cracks everyone up at the end. We’ll see PJ do more water stunts, and JG with more sky stuff. Hazelnut will have the Gold Horse to prance around on, Fai will do more changing tricks. They’ll kill things that look like two different animals joined at birth, and probably will meet some near-immortal beings with strange personalities, who give advice to the heroes as they try and find Nicky Angel. They’ll see some new facet of an immortal they thought was unchangeable (in book one it was Afrodatey and in 2 it was the Mars Bar). It always happens like that. This is the template Riordan follows.
PAPER CROWNS, complete at 69,000 words, is a different type of YA fantasy. I’m an avid reader sick of vampires, elves and dragons. Instead I tossed talking animals, booze and bad attitude into the frying pan and am serving up something new.
And the midwest setting--flat and beautiful and huge and kind of scary in the way that hope depends on the weather, is brought vividly to life.
The author is a Reiki Master and Colour Therapist and has dedicated his life to helping others. All of his artwork is channelled and brings a very positive message of hope and healing. His work is born from love, created in love and given in love.
After watching my sporty schoolfriends zoom down the line crossing the valley and execute a perfect, graceful descent, I held my breath, scrunched up my eyes and leapt off into the dizzying drop.
suburban and ordinary second class; 3 paise per km for mail/express second class; 5
Anyway, this topic got me wondering about you. Do you consider yourself a "fashion person" -- i.e., someone who follows fashion fervently and puts its dictates into practice -- or could you care less and do you just sew/wear what you like?
- great color selection
Instinctively he dry heaves thinking it a figment of his hungover
Cheating is in your DNA,
Vagabond - Wolfmother (I remember there being a big fuss over Wolfmother – some saying how they were the next big thing, others saying they were overrated. I didn’t really pay them any attention, but I heard this in (500) Days of Summer - great film, great soundtrack (although use of Sweet Disposition was a bit tired) – and really liked it so downloaded it. Haven’t heard any of their other stuff)
Fried Rice:
- James Baldwin, Another Country p. 29
Before we start - a big ‘thank-you’ to Mr. @ for his continued support and inspiration, and for the help with my mixing software.
Where do you see Andrew James in three years’ time?
“You do that,” she grinned. “I can see it now, Howard, King of the World.”
4/17: Digital Cinema; Screening: Tron (1982); Reading: Manovich, “What is Digital Cinema?” (CV 1060-1068)
Alan Desland lives a perfectly satisfactory life as a mildly successful ceramics dealer in a quiet English town. His passion--if it can be called that--is for his lovely, fragile figurines and tea sets. What he doesn't realize is that what he's always accepted as happiness is actually equivalent to being chained to the wall in Plato's cave.
Extreme Wildlife Encounter
Soissons, France. 1414.
Coming back to this place with strong power to an undeniable extent, heating up the place
In their student's position, you and I would know we were being told lies, but how would they know that? What their teachers tell them is what the telly tells them, and their parents were taught the same lies as they are, so there is nobody to put them right.
HERRIDGE: In a radio interview with FOX, former CIA Director Michael Hayden said there is no question the CIA program including waterboarding laid the foundation for bin Laden’s capture.
Nothing happened, we didn't die or anything, and in fact, the ride ended up being pleasantly uneventful, in a nice roller coaster-y sort of way. But when I retold the story to the Man, he was wildly entertained by my sound effects, and suggested that the next morning's paper would have featured, as its headline, "KaSMASHo!"
Would love to start a conversation on pros and cons of this kind of detox or hear anyone else’s detox experiences before I try this!
It’s also about f*cking time. Translation: It's important and historic, but it's late so let me whine about it. So we get six paragraphs of mincing about federalism and how awful it is that the government grants benefits to married couples, all of it culminating in this nonsense:
"Well no, of course not, but--"
"Jelly doughnuts. They're like an instant orgasm for your tongue." --Pg. 134 of "Slide" by Jill Hathaway
OCTOBER - These were pictures I took at our Thanksgiving Day feast!! (Notice my nephews' "Novembeards"??) My cute niece, Melissa, looks soooo adorably pregnant ... hard to believe she still had FOUR weeks to go by the looks of that baby bump!! (Not sure what I woulda done with the inspiration I grabbed from Heather Summers' creations ... I was feeling stale and she breathed some new life into me!!)
28. We Wish You A Merry Christmas - John Denver & The Muppets
+ 4 cups of water
6. To see sanctioning and censure power in regard to competition and competition directors.
during special moments in their lives.
You may ask why did she do it? Well, she felt prompted to do it. And I'm so glad she did! She didn't want any recognition for it. She asked if I posted not to mention her name. (that's why I didn't post the card just in case someone knew she had made that card, but trust me it's so pretty!)
07.Tape Kingz
The past season of Community has been something special. It’s not just that it’s been consistently hilarious or that the characters are relatable and interesting. Almost every episode has been a giant middle finger to the very idea that there are limits to what can be done with a half hour of television. This is how TV should be made: with an eye for detail, a pure joy in the craft and an unrelenting commitment to the unexpected. The question of exactly which episodes are the very best of season two is such an important one that I felt I should get a second, third and fourth opinion, so joining me on this one are Steve, Sara and Katie. I promise that these are expert opinions. I know a lot of people who watch Community, but none of them know the ins and outs of every episode like these three. I don’t agree with all of their opinions, but I respect them 100%.
OK I'll let the man who was there on the ground with the plan tell his story. Over to you, Skull:
The mandatory jizya tax for infidels.
Six Most Common Injuries Caused by Power Tools
The Dell Latitude C640 service manual describe in lenghty details how to actually change the CPUs. There isn’t much point in describing it here: just remove the hard drive, the keyboard, then the CPU thermal cooling assembly and you can easily access the CPU socket.
Guffaw in AZ said...
We both pretty much spat sugar over each other as we experienced simultaneous Cookiegasms upon first bite. I took photos as I went along baking, and think I have all my measurements and times pretty darn close.
And that, of course, is what God requires of us—relationship with Him. If we claim to have relationship with Him but fail to spend time in His presence—well, maybe it’s time for a heart check to see if we really are born again. Do our hearts yearn to be in His presence? Do we miss Him when we’re away? Do we long to please Him and do His will, to hear Him say, “Well done, good and faithful servant,” not because we’ve done anything so wonderful but because He has allowed us to partner with Him and serve in His name?
So, while Halloween does certainly have its earliest origins in pagan ritual, the holiday we know and celebrate today is actually based on a combination of pagan, Roman and Christian practices, along with more than a few secular goodies thrown in. Candy corn, anyone?
So, we dragged ourselves, parched and withered, toward an entirely unnecessary and abysmally selected (on our part as meal-assemblers) shrimp po' boy. Had we known the Brussels sprouts salad would've come up so short, we would have changed this order or nixed it altogether. Not only did the plate plunked down in front of us contain super salty friend shrimp, it was piled high with deep fried potato wedges. (Listen to me, complaining over my own poorly chosen indulgences and their calories which could sustain 10 human lives for a month when there are so many hungry people in the world.) We wrestled down a few bites and called it a nigh, not really noticing the jalapeno aioli or apple slaw that should've balanced the breadiness of the sandwich and friend shrimp.
Hey, you. Yes, you. The guy over there, whining about the fact that some military members and Secret Service agents went whoring in Cartagena. (source) Come over here.
Southern Tier
To Mum: This will be the first time that I will be unable to say to you, “Happy Mother’s Day.” You see, Mum passed away recently, while being comforted by family members. Mum, If only you could be with me now so I could hold you in my arms. Mum, you will always be in my heart and mind. Your loving son – Peter.
and the orchard too, the fruit, the trunks,
4) Completing collections
I think that we may finally be on the mend around here. We are still in various states of illness, and our house has completely come apart at the seams, but the overall trend seems to be improving. This morning, Freja and I found ourselves all alone for the first time in weeks – the big kids were off at school and Willow had a play date before her kindergarten class – so we decided to step outside of our petri dish of a home and get some fresh air. I took a risk and headed to a park I had never explored before, but that I had heard glowing things about: Red Rock Wilderness Overlook Regional Park. What a beautiful treasure! This is now my very, very favorite bit of nearby wilderness.
Fly on the Wall (2006)
Anywho... we muddled through the mystery shop and I took notes of the all the staff's personal details... name, height, age, gender, hair length, eye color, blood type, social security number, etc...
I have a confession; I’m not sure where to go with this blog.
I was born telling stories. I got this from my dad who got it from his dad....I tell so many stories of stuff that happens for many reasons; A. I love attention. No joke, I absolutely do. B. I love making people laugh as it entertains not them, but me too. It's sort of a challenge to see if I am able to. When they do I feel I have succeeded. C. Isn't it our (the Jews) sense of humor that's kept us going for how many thousands of years? So that's why I tell stories. Often times when i'm telling my audience (friends, family or essentially whoever is willing to listen) I have one friend in particular who will often say "only you Melissa. This could not happen to anyone else"! This makes me laugh because I'TS true as well. She also has for years encouraged me to write some of this crap down so tonight; February 17th, 2012 I decided I will give this a go. I've blogged before, a few times but they did not last. So I am going to try and keep this alive by not putting too much undue pressure on myself and simply write when the mood strikes. It struck tonight so I will regale my fans with my first entry : ).
One picture was of a calm lake. The lake was a perfect mirror, for peaceful towering mountains were all around it. Overhead was a blue sky with fluffy white clouds. All who saw this picture thought that it was a perfect picture of peace.
Above Abu Salim’s grocery store
I know this post will undoubtedly upset some folks. I understand those of you who will be saying…”What the heck does he mean by this? Of course, Prince Albert is better. Is this guy off his nut or something?”
I'm pretty sure I moved to TX and tolerate 120* summer days and living 1500 miles away from my family for the express purpose of NOT having to freeze my hoobie off.
The male has probably been sheltering on one of the ledges out of the wind’s reach and will put in an appearance at some point, possibly with food. A rain and sleet shower in Nottingham is hardly a challenge to the birds though, as peregrines can breed in a wide range of climates from arctic tundra to tropical rain forests; in fact it’s one of the most widespread birds of prey which can be found on every continent except Antarctica.
All images from Paper Smooches; DP oldie stuff from my stash.
Well, it has been a crazy month and I have had a hard time finding time to get to this challenge at Hummie's World. But I am finally done. I have learned a lot by trying to work more with brushes and actions, so this kit has been a huge learning curve. I hope you enjoy it and can use it for your scrapping! Click on the preview to download! Enjoy!!
For those keeping track of such things, Moneygall sits astride the border between Tipperary and Offally counties, between Dublin and Limerick.
I am one of the Game Techs (#2, Lucia) and I manipulate the games. Make them a lot more interesting. Don’t want to give it all away in case there is one person who hasn’t seen the movie yet. LOL! While we were shooting, Gary Ross yells out, “You need a name! Someone give me a Roman-sounding name!” Lucia was born…just like that. I hope to have a bigger role in the sequel (hint, hint…Mr. or Mrs. NEW director).
"And what would you like me to do about this?"
Saturday, October 27th–Sick.
and hang onto the whats left in me
Crazy, crazy, crazy. But true. I woke up today and thought about it in the shower and while I brushed my hair. I was even motivated to scoop up a big load of laundry. That is huge because the last few days were so emotionally gut wrenching for me I could barely motivate myself out of bed let alone doing the household chore I detest most.
Later he began working with the great Coro Folklórico Nacional, (initally formed by Ignacio Piñeiro), with whom he continues today.
4 application
Add 5 Tablespoons to your beef stew!
However, its residents are fighting back, recently setting up the Jeffrey’s Bay Community Police Forum, with its members warning that people must ‘thinking of Jeffrey’s Bay as a peaceful fisherman’s village…’
It's important. It's NECESSARY.
About me: The author of "Tangled in Wisteria," he is a music teacher in Van Buren, Arkansas and a father of four. His work has been published in the United States, Canada and Australia, including Haiku Harvest, Clouds Peak, Stylus Poetry Journal, Wisteria, American Tanka, Fire Pearls, Eucalypt and Modern English Tanka.
the quickest way to calm me down
Um...icky photo. Also before the new camera (and learning not to take photos at night.) I laugh when I see posts and photos from when we first started this blog a year ago. Clearly, I knew nothing about taking photos. But that's what it's about, right?
he’s being held hostage in Cuba. Stand by for my exclusive, very
On Friday, my cousin's son got married. The solemnization ceremony was held at the Sultan Mosque after which we all proceeded to my cousin's place for a feast. Then last night, we attended the sit-down wedding dinner in a hall. We, the relatives, didn't have to do much.... just sat & ate & mingled a little bit while the singers & dancers entertained the guests.
He made sure that the cells of Azkaban
Logan Forsythe SD S 20
We recognize that now.
They are pretty pleased with the result and I think it looks pretty cute. We all had a hand in it somewhere, even the man of the house painted the sky because little people's arms could not reach that high. I wonder what a real estate agent will say about it if we ever decide to sell!!
Jan.; Venue; Nov.
Lynsey
All that we have done.
By 1996, it became the PC market leader in China. The company officially changed its name to Lenovo in 2004, before it acquired IBM’s global PC business for $1.75 billion. Lenovo also develops and manufactures workstations, servers and hardware components. After the acquisition, it became the third largest PC producer in the world.
PEACE. Ashtar. Beth and Mark www.GalacticRoundTable.com
"Do you need to cross?"
But I know I’m not a flight of fancy,
Guess what? It really is amazing! My kiddos call it "the magic sharpener" because I put their pencils in and they come out perfect every time! They are used to standing at the class sharpener on the wall for 5 minutes only to have a pencil that still isn't sharp. They love that they can come to this sharpener, and in just a few seconds, their pencil is perfect. They really think it is magic!
Menon had been in the custody of the Naxals since April 21.
‘Don’t be surprised (or discouraged) at the painful trial you are suffering, as though something strange were happening to you.’ Understand you are ‘participating in the sufferings of Christ. When you suffer, it is according to God’s will. He wants you to learn that He, as your faithful Creator, can sustain you and bring you through whatever you are facing. You should commit yourself to Him and continue to do good.’
And then they all got drunk and fucked their mistresses. I bet Strategic Air Command circa the Kennedy administration made Madmen look like a Middle School dance.
Vegetable oil, 1 teaspoon
At the end of the show, the organizers mysteriously brought two planks of wood on stage and set them down on the floor. The two guitarists were busy doing that outro thing where they play the same note over and over, as the drummer crashed the cymbals slower and slower, signifying the death knell.
The girls yelled, screamed, and kicked, but no one seemed to notice.
Your crawling everywhere and fast.
song, a sort of horn solo for the human voice, then spirals off into
A master in the art of making Parmesan cheese, Manjit Singh is part of a large community of Sikhs in northern Italy who are shoring up an industry under threat of extinction.
Ariel around the wild old stones:
Shamanism didn’t go over well with the Red Guards. Ho lost everything (but his herbal–a 19th-century edition of The Book of Flowers–buried safely under his floorboards) to attacks and round-ups during the Cultural Revolution. His books were burned and he was thrown in prison.
Can Jake help a real Monster Baby fall asleep?
“I didn’t do as well as I could.
Viola sororia, common blue violet
Jen, you deserve the best birthday EVAH - I hope your day is Tony the Tiger GRRRrrrrrRReat!!!
When you examine these colors on the color wheel, you can see how they are related. You will also note that the complements of the primary colors (red, yellow and blue) are all secondary colors (green, purple and orange).
Last October, they did a test of the tower’s lighting, so we had a preview of what the Tokyo Sky Tree will look like when it’s illuminated every evening.
In fiscal year 2009, municipal government greenhouse gas emissions were 3.5 million metric tons of carbon dioxide equivalent, 1.1 percent below fiscal year 2006 levels and 3.5 percent below fiscal year 2008 levels. These reductions occurred largely as a result of less carbon-intensive and more efficient electricity generation, City improvements in the efficiency of streetlights, reductions in emissions associated with the transport of solid waste to final destinations outside the city, and reduced City government energy consumption.
Like many of my readers, my "go to" shopping places do not include the malls. In fact, other than groceries, cleaning products and toiletries, I rarely buy anything that wasn't pre-owned. Shopping the thrift stores, yard sales, and consignment shops requires a reverse kind of thinking. Although you might have a "would love to find" list, you go without expectations and generally come home with things that hadn't crossed your mind.
Hell & The Voidoids (Hell, Quine, Julian, Bell) at Music Machine, London, 1977
So many times I've started to write about him. I can never bring myself to do it. There must be 14 drafts on here started and never realized. Because I'm scared. Because I don't want to give him the satisfaction.
“Following up on your question regarding Chris Scanlon and Alicia Perez, the answer is yes,” the HSN spokesman said in an email. “After being a valued and contributing employee for more than 21 years, Chris Scanlon is no longer with HSN. Alicia Perez is no longer with the company as well. We thank Chris and Alicia for their many contributions to HSN and wish them well in their future endeavors.”
“Who do you call about things like this?”
Then you will see the wonders
I happened to get lucky with these great reads which helped me to pass my sleepless time, too...
Here are a few of my favorite (inexpensive) blogger DIY projects I'm itching to try:
Yesterday we decided that we wanted to see the Glasshouse Mountains, which are located in the hinterlands of the Sunshine Coast. Getting there from Brisbane is amazingly easy, it simply requires catching a train from central Brisbane and you are there in about an hour. Plus you can use your goCard so you don’t even have to buy a ticket while running late for the train! So off we went with our bikes and explored the southern parts of the mountains for the day travelling a comfortable 29km in around 4hours.
But the good news is that it is easier for an author-illustrator to find an agent--there are more agents out there who are willing to represent author-illustrators because you won’t be splitting royalties. And picture book editors tend to favor author-illustrators because their work sells a little better.
That said, we must keep in mind the fact that governments themselves are made up of mostly flawed people, and such, we cannot expect them to be the sole judges of the human condition. We must not heed to them the sole power to judge morality, or else we allow them the possibility to determine it. Too much government control is as bad as too little. C.S. Lewis decries this as the road to tyranny in his essay, “Is Progress Possible: Willing Slaves of the Welfare State.” In it, he says:
But far from being just a beautiful forum for beautiful men to wrap their beautifully toned, sweaty arms around each other, soccer is also narratively engaging. In no other sport, nor tournament–sorry Olympics– are the malignancies of globalism so exposed on a world stage. Soccer explains everything!
Kensington/Boro Park Tops List of Safest Brooklyn Neighborhoods
They landed on the rooftop helipad as scheduled and were unceremoniously led to a penthouse conference room. Emma noticed the wall sized screen as they entered, broadcasting the neighborhood where they had been only a short time before. Bodies, both human and bunny, were scattered around the area, with gratuitous closeups of the grenade impact zone.
Buyer reviews of Ohaus Scout Pro SP202 Portable Digital Gram – Food – Ingredient – Jewelry – Lab Balance Scale, Capacity 200g x 0.01g or 7 oz x 0.0005 oz, 4.7 in. Dia. Weigh Pan are available in the merchant’s website, see it by visit the link below.
Mrs. Cowper's grating voice broke his concentration, and he looked up from the soft lips of his interlocutor to see her chaperone bearing down on them like a ship of the line. Even in the near dark he saw how pale the older woman's face was. She was also short of breath, but given her size that was to be expected. One could not haul that much weight up and down between decks without strain.
I am not.
Well, the story behind it is related to those headphones! I have finally realized something... though we keep saying that it is difficult to craft for men, there is one thing that isn't so difficult. Every man has a weakness (apart from the woman in their life ;-) ) - sports, gadgets, cars or such like! And my brother-in-law is a gadget freak :-p with these speakers and headphones being on his wishlist forever! :D So, though nobody is yet gifting him these, I thought it would go well in her card! The quote is of course partly Shakespeare and partly me ;-)
I cannot! I cannot see well enough to figure out the letters and thus cannot leave comments as usual. For many of the blogs that I read that use smaller font, I have to copy and paste into a word document so that I can read them with a larger font. But this word verification thing... I just cannot do it.
First I read this:
Please send us your ideas / films by April 30th 2012 (or get in touch if you have something in mind that might take a bit longer).
e = 101
There are more wineries around Wagga than I remembered, and they seem to do the cellar door stuff. I wouldn’t know … I would be hard pressed to think of anything on earth that I give less of a crap about than wine. But the vineyards are pretty.
Good luck with the challenge and please remember our rules! Closing date is Sunday 23 October at 12noon GMT
I arrived late in the night in Rhode Island, anxious to meet my two-day-old grandson, Blake, after a full day of flying. My daughter and son-in-law had just returned home from the hospital and felt like they had been in a train wreck. There was stuff everywhere. Already, the needs of this little eight-pound bundle of joy were enormous: an all-terrain stroller, plenty of diapers, onesies, spit-up rags, an assortment of pacifiers to try out until he found the ideal one.
I add a class or two of whatever I am interested in at the time, flavor it with writing, squeeze in some new friends, stir in some thought to finances, pour in heaping servings of church, a dab of farming, a bit of public speaking, some volunteer work , lots of reading and travel. Mix well with patience and sacrifice and bake with the love and forgiveness of God. Sprinkle plenty of laughter often and freely.Ta da here's Debra, a happy woman!
Having read some blogs and articles that FHA is the place to go for bad credit credit and easy loans; it strikes me as someone who has no idea what they are talking about. Why? FHA does not make bad credit loans and they never did. Yes, they did make less than perfect credit loans but if it was bad???? The loan was declined. The credit, underwriting rules and regulations are "not easy." In fact they are sometimes complicated because it might work if 10 things meet the standards of the approval. I do believe other UNDERWRITERS would agree with me on this one. Also, they are much more cumbersome than getting a conventional/FNMA/FHLMC loan to approval. A lot more documentation is required in most cases and it varies from conventional lending to FHA. The appraisals require a much more extensive review and never would I say that FHA loans are easier.
I have such an exciting life.
Moreover, the study concludes that the proposed legislation will (1) not improve patent quality,
It is water resistant SPF 35 and safe enough for the entire family with no added fragrance.
None of that is true here, so provided we don't repeat the "problem out-of-the-box" experience, we'll be good to go. Which makes me stop and think about how blessed we are, and how grateful I am for our blessings, even the ones I usually take for granted--like food kept safe from spoiling. And cats who are too big to sit in the fridge bins. :)
Other supplies used: Stamps from Taylored Expressions, Ranger Dylusions and Our Daily Bread; Stazon jet black ink pad; Black Sharpie pen; Claudine Helmuth Studio Paint (color: Dab of Yellow) Distress Ink, Pine Needles (shading of leaves on tree and trunk) and Q-tips.
I turn back to the mirror and splash some water on my face.
I think it’s natural to be excited for the upcoming phases of publication because this is all so new and, well…exciting! I’m always over the moon to enter a new step of this process. But I’m also so anxious to move forward, that I wonder if I’m sometimes missing the beauty of the step I’m in.
Once again, of course, it is necessary to ignore the uncomfortable facts which do not fit the lies of political correctness. For to claim as the apologists for Imam Feisal Abdul Rauf, the man behind this plan, that this is a peaceful act of bridge building between Islam and the West, requires the turning of a wilfully blind ear to how it's planned construction is being described in Muslim lands.
Bahrain has been in turmoil since February last year when protesters demanding democratic reforms took to the streets after successful popular revolts in Egypt and Tunisia.
1/4 cup spring onion (only greens)
83. Caddyshack (Bill Murray)
What’s it about? Well, I am keeping that to myself. For now. The script isn’t ready to be read. I’m going to take a red pen to that sucker and make it better. But not right now. I have some other projects that need finishing first.
5/14 Columbus, OH - The Basement
how it was I quote before Pim with Pim after Pim how it is three parts I say it as I hear it
A refreshing change from the overly-posed, flatteringly-lit calendars of well-oiled firemen and pneumatic Hooters waitresses, this 2012 for-charity calendar's naked archaeologists are actually getting some work done. I wonder if the cute one is carbon dating anyone? (Ebay)
4. Continue going through AFI’s 100 Best Movies list. Self-explanatory – I love to watch movies, especially good and/or classic movies, so I’ll be crossing off a few more on this list.
I believe this grew more intense for several reasons. I was around this man a lot. I put myself in a situation in which I spent a great deal of time with him. Patrick even made comments about this other man wanting to date me if I didn’t have a ring on my finger. He had no idea I was struggling with impure thoughts and his comments only fueled the fire inside me.
The majority of V merchandise seems to be Rack Toys mostly made in South America (watch out for fakes) which are unrelated spaceships, pistols and these little PVC figures of the characters. Yes, this crude little guy is the closest thing the world will ever see to Marc Singer/Mike Donavan action figure.
Thank you to all my faithful readers and followers. Seeing your comments makes my day.. thank you so much!
That something is usually steeped in power and control.
4. Move It On Over
In the meantime, I'm off to run the usual Saturday morning errands. Thanks as always for dropping by, and if you're on facebook, do drop by my page for more frequent updates!
* What inspired you to write Phoebe Finds Her Voice?
She did not bring many books with her, as most of the ones she read belonged to the public collection. She did, however, straighten out her notes, spending a full day writing out a copy for herself, and then giving the originals to the library for reference. Even if they were just notes, it would be helpful for other scholars of the Light, she was sure. And keeping a copy for herself would allow her to write out that book she had been contemplating, if she could find the time.
A self initiated project responding to the theme of control.
A Gentleman's Game and Private Wars by Greg Rucka (dustjacket photography/art on both by Tom Hallman). I've owned the Bantam hardcover first edition of A Gentleman's Game since it was published in 2004 (bought in Forbidden Planet in London in those dark days before I discovered Amazon), and I picked up a cheap first edition of its 2005 sequel, Private Wars, the other week, ahead of the publication of the third novel in the series, The Last Run, later this month:
Given how it set the tone not just for the Volkswagen campaign, but for DDB and the whole creative revolution that followed, you’ll be surprised to learn how ambiguous Krone felt about it. He initially rejected the line as too abstract. In fact, he hated it, as well as the whole approach of selling the VW as an “honest” car (Krone wanted to “Americanize” the car along the lines of “See the U.S.A. in your Chevrolet.”) – but was finally persuaded to lay it out. (Bernbach, by all accounts, was only tangentially involved in the Volkswagen creative.)
I know, I know...SHE IS GORGEOUS!!!!!! I am in love with this inanimate object and yes, I have on occasion over the past few days, just held it up to my nose and breathed in the leather. I have also opened up the bolt action on Anastasiya and got a little high on her scent as well. Do not anyone email me telling me how dangerous lead is or the corrosive properties of Russian ammo, I don't care. I don't smoke, I don't drink a lot, I don't drive fast, I work out, I eat healthy, I go to the doctor annually for all of those lovely little tests, I take a mutli vitamin, and I carry a gun. I don't exactly live life on the edge, but regardless of the risks, I am going to sniff my rifle from time to time.
We find tea one of the necessities of life in the strictest sense of the word. A Chinese never drinks cold water, which he abhors and considers unhealthy. Tea is his favourite beverage from morning until night; not what we call tea, mixed with milk and sugar, but the essence of the herb itself drawn out in pure water. One acquainted with the habits of this people can scarcely conceive the idea of the Chinese Empire existing were it deprived of the tea plant; and I am sure that the extensive use of this beverage adds much to the health and comfort of the great body of the people.
CCWC first secured status as a participating non-profit organization in Gunnison County’s Alternative Services program– seeking volunteers who were mandated to serve the community. CCWC outlined their project to recruit volunteers for the summer, then set up a process of finding and screening volunteers to gauge their comfort with outdoor work. CCWC then began working with community service volunteers to install erosion-reducing BMPs along Kebler Pass Road. Installing these erosion control measures requires large teams of people in order to be successful. The community service volunteers became instrumental in helping staff and contractors reach an appropriate number of participants. The community service volunteers were also helpful in teaching new participants how to install the BMPs.
Sikkim - Bunjee Jumping - Getting Nepal - Nepal Information.Nepal
JIM: "I'll be sending you and Gary the money I owe you..."
I have worked in a variety of bars during my bartending career and I know better than to pull this kind of crap on anyone else. To me, announcing that you're a bartender in a situation where you are clearly the one who is throwing attitude and acting like a jackass just screams "douche".
I spend a crazy amount of time in the laundry room. Although it isn't huge, I wanted to add my own personality and make it a happy place to be. I simply added fabric, paint and some flowers. Go for colors and prints that make you smile!
With a swirl of colour and a swipe of line.
cinematography by Arthur C. Miller
They had a really big set of oak kitchen cabinets, too big a set for our kitchen really, but also others that he said we’d paint anyway so we’ll look with measurements in hand next time. This man has never painted wood in his life. The infinite power of DIY/decor blogs!!
It comes complete with two latex condoms, a travel toothbrush and toothpaste, and a wet wipe for raccoon eyes. And, of course, a nice pair of clean thong underwear with the "Ho on the Go" logo.
I'm glad to see she got some rest!
As much as I enjoy writing what I am passionate about; I also love reading other bloggers’ posts. Other bloggers can inspire us, enlighten us, take us on exciting journeys, make us laugh, or even make us cry. Most of all, they are like a distant friend. Yet, the distance doesn’t weaken the blogging bond that we all share together. And as “The Island Traveler” so eloquently wrote on his blog, “It’s not about numbers, but it’s building meaningful connections.”
Ellen Moffat, University of Saskatchewan. Unmediating the City: The Soundwalk as Embodied Probe
Do you have protection? Where is the train station?
.....as I try to think of more ideas, all I can think of is excuses.
Let's just say that Joe-- acting stupidly, without malice, in his strange "14-year old 21-year old" way - managed to shred all semblance of acceptable (and perhaps legal) behavior through inappropriate (and possibly illegal) relationships, online.
Happy 2012! Hope it's started off swimmingly for all of you. I've been querying, writing, rescuing cats, traveling overseas, and studying, studying, studying....
The BH6820SW 3D Blu-ray Home Theater System LG Smart TV access to limitless content, thousands of movies, customizable apps, instant streaming movies, shows and music direct from your Wi-Fi connection to your TV. Full HD video and superior audio performance with Blu-ray. Crystal-clear, dazzling sound from state-of-the-art speakers. It’s the total package. KEY TECHNOLOGIES UNLIMITED ENTERTAINMENT WITH LG SMART TV ACCESS What good is all … Read More >>
39 min: Ben Arfa runs at the Chelsea defence and tries to slip the ball through to Ba, but over-hit his pass after a fine build-up. Newcastle have been impressive so far, showing admirable enterprise and, usually, execution. “Re: your linguistic conundrum,” blurts Hugh Collins. “An American commentator recently pushed the envelope of soccer analysis by saying that Petr Cech put in a “surreal” performance in the Champions League semi. I didn’t see the game, but am imagining that Cech threw a fish at Leo Messi?” Clearly that American commentator was talking a load of carp.
Almsneszmely
By the end of the day, Zeke was so tired that he walked over to the backpack and wanted to get in... "All done!" That's what Zeke says when he is finished with something, whether it's a nap or a meal or he wants off of the swing:) Those two words come in handy!
prized symbol of a family’s recognition and
1) Sugar Sweet Sunshine: Have loved them from the moment they opened. Such a cozy, wonderful neighborhood bakery. Delicious cupcakes - simple but perfect. Their vanilla/vanilla sunshine cupcake as well as red velvet stand out, but my very favorite is their occasional (I had them at Christmastime) peppermint frosting. Wow! And shhh...sometimes I indulge in their coffee cake. Also try the chocolate bomb (chocolate cake mixed into pudding) - to die for!
Their song “I Am A Shadow” was a great introduction for me, and I hope it will be for you, too. The song is apparently about one person who feels a sense of solitude that won’t go away, even while being mixed in with an endless crowd of people. Yet even through it all, he doesn’t lose hope. (Emooooooo. But I looooooove it.)
Since then so much has happened that my doubts, unfortunately, have been confirmed. The question is no longer the wisdom of Nick deciding to stay on for three years despite admitting that he’s not able to lead the party through the next election. After what I’ve seen and read it now has as much to do with the mind set and suitability of Nick and the team around him.I'll need some convincing.
I didn’t get any sort of epiphany from solanin. Instead it was more of an affinity — I didn’t just relate to these characters, I WAS these characters, trapped, confused, unsure of how to move forward. The best thing solanin did for me was point out that I wasn’t alone, that I wasn’t actually failing just because I didn’t know where my life was supposed to go from here. It also reminded me that even when your lost, you can’t just stand still: after Taneda’s death, Meiko ends her months of wallowing by picking up his guitar and deciding to join his old band. Music isn’t her dream, not like it was for Taneda, but it becomes something for her to do, to focus on. She finds a long sought-after connection, and even if it’s not necessarily moving forward, it’s still moving, which is better than sitting round letting the toxins collect. It may have filled me with an undefinable feeling (friends I lent it to didn’t fare much better, returning the book with an uncomfortable look on their faces) but I’m glad I read this manga at the time I did.
Originally posted October 19, 2009
The book was reprinted so here is the original and the more generic looking reprint side by side:
Next week we will highlight the career and recipes of Zarela Martinez. It will be really interesting to see what everyone comes up with. If you'd like to join us please email me for additional information no later than Monday, May 7th.
Batu
- Median damages between 1995 and 2008 have held relatively steady, with occasional ups-and-downs - in 2003, the median damage award peaked at $10.41M; in 2007 it sank to a low of $1.11M.
It is excellent for grades 1–8 in Catholic schools and parish catechetical programs as well as at home.
Taxes, fees, more taxes and more fees. It’s happening at all levels of government. After all, the government needs our support, or more precisely our money…our hard-earned money. And the federal government certainly knows how to spend our hard-earned money better than you or me. Certainly!
- Made another excellent dinner from the Giada at Home cookbook. The family loved the Grilled Chicken and Shrimp with Chimichurri sauce.
The most famous Superman movie version was, of course, the 1978 film “Superman” starring Christopher Reeve. This movie came out 40 years after Superman first appeared inside the pages of Action Comics # 1 created by Jerry Siegel and Joe Shuster in 1938!
My guess is that the lads had come to Canberra to attend the annual Summernats car festival, a three day event where young men spend all their money on petrol, junk food, beer and birds. They head back home on the Sunday, sunburnt a blistering red and running on the last fumes of their credit cards.
Olson goes on to say:
Sale was in many films in the 30s, including The Star Witness (1931), The Gentleman from Louisiana (1936) and You Only Live Once (1937). It will come as no surprise to learn that while in Hollywood, one of his best friends was Will Rogers. Sale died an unfortunate and untimely death of pneumonia in 1936.
Now, here’ s a quick blurb and excerpt to whet your appetite :
Mirza, knowing the layout of the house from the years he had spent in it, quietly slips inside and asks a woman confidante to alert Sahibañ of his arrival. He, then, climbs up to her room, brings her down, helps her into the saddle on his horse and, with Sahibañ clinging to him, gallops away into the night.
Each pod has a film casing that dissolves in water, releasing the cleaning ingredients only when the casing dissolves. The film is designed to dissolve in all water temperatures, hot or cold. Tide Pods have been thoroughly tested on all sorts of laundry conditions and are safe for both whites and colors. They are designed to dissolve completely in all water temperatures and will not stain your clothes when used as directed.
The final savory dish blows it out of the park with seared foie doused in an intense citric glaze. The darker dots on the plate are reminiscent of maple; upon inquiry, Daniele explains that it’s a reduction of sherry. He pulls a bottle out of the bodega and offers us a glass each to sample the original – the complex sweetness serenades with notes of ripe cherry and woody vanilla, so seductive that I neglect to keep track of the name.
The oak drawers are actually an old apothecary cabinet, refinished and turned sideways. It was used to store little bottles of chemicals; the drawers were vertical and had little shelves inside where the bottles sat.
You know how you always hear stories of crazy old ladies that live with 50 cats? Well, if I'm not careful, I'll be known someday as that crazy old lady with all the pianos!!
Here are some photos Tanya sent me of the gorgeous celebration she put together.
Grace, compassion, kindness I beg for these daily, I guess the least I can do is pass it on to others.
Finally something I do want. But shouldn’t that be a given?
This is an Illustration based on the Fairy Tale
I have to go practice headbanging.
Kamakura has a number of famous temples. We visited several of them. I must admit that visiting temples with young children can be quite challenging and tough. Fortunately my sisters entertained both of my girls the whole time which was extremely helpful. I think that the key is to pace yourselves with the number of site you plan to visit a day (one in the morning, lunch and one in the afternoon) and try not to cram.
The decisive, adaptable, aware, questing/questioning and observant teacher — active observation being among the desired attributes for any nimble teacher of young people – will be the most effective bearer of any subject embedded in the fluid, evolving situation of the classroom that he/she must be mindful of and control.
Can you believe that we are already past the middle of April?! At first glance, this Cinco de Mayo post seems awfully early, but May 5th is two short weeks from Saturday! A few years ago, when our oldest was too young for official preschool, I taught a Cinco de Mayo lesson in our little, four-kiddo preschool co-op. The little ones loved all of the activities, and the Cinco de Mayo lesson post on my old blog is to this day the most popular post.
Oh yes. Records. not downloads to an ipod, kids, back in the day, music was analogue and glorious.
Three snippets from the large literature by experts on these matters. These are not so useful to US political interests as Waldman’s paper — hence no barrage of media attention — but more valuable.
I’ll also home school my kid….not because I think public school is bad, but because as an educator myself I’d love to teach about Rome in Rome and about volcanoes on the rim of a volcano. Not only would this provide an excellent educational opportunity for a child, it would give me great settings and characters and cultures to develop my own writing.
Ben and Emily Huh, Co-founders of Cheezburger Network
"I was out walking with Darren. Just over there near the bottom of the hill. We had a bit of a row and I was on my way home. Then I saw you fall in! The perfect antidote!"
at 19: when I wrote of it
I wouldn’t know where to begin if I did.
Brazil is in the news today as well because a Brazilian court has decided that the construction of the world’s third largest dam could go ahead without indigenous groups who live in the area to be consulted!
So on Christmas Eve, to share our celebration with him, I emailed and Facebooked photos to Afghanistan to keep the family together. You see, the earrings and necklace below were a gift from the soldier nephew…
“What’s fantastic about about the fan base of F1 is that its generally a very technical audience. that sets you apart from the football fan lets say. you understand, and you want to understand, technology and we want to keep feeding that”
This venue is also not that hard to get to. Once you get off the highway it can be a little tricky if you have never been there before but if you have a GPS you should be fine. There are also a few places you can park. I generally like to be in the parking lot thats off to the left of the venue rather than the garage on the right. This is just because the parking lot is closer to the venue and where people line up to get in and unless you are the first one back to your car you are going to be waiting for a long time to get out of the garage. One time I went and met up with some friends. After the show I was texting one of them about the wait to get out of the garage and she told me she was already home. I couldn’t believe that.
... which is quite apt, seeing as this kind of law really is just that. A Westminster joke at the electorate's expense.
These planners delivered thoughtful insights, diving into the economic and political climate, the state of and fever of the upcoming 2012 Olympics, and the constantly evolving value of representation in traditional media.
Enough Said !!!!
You can see how to enter that here!
The Scarlet Bride
ascend in the air
And sometimes it takes us
Here is someone spinning, in the Himalayas.
I was so busy cutting the cake on the day that I forgot to take proper pictures of it. The ones I posted above and below happen to be the last slice of cake, which looks like a mangled mess with strawberries barely clinging onto the frosting. Nevertheless, I was pleasantly surprised that the cake tasted quite good, although next time, I would probably slice the cake into three layers instead of two, and fill it with more cream and strawberries. And if raspberries are in season, I would definitely add those too!
know how it goes. One day the grass is brown and
Today, Natalia and I participated in our tae kwon do school’s demonstration, which we performed at the Railroad Green on Main Street for the Warwick (NY) Springfest: A Home and Garden Expo. This event has vendors, music, dancing and the Warwick Slider Challenge, in which local eateries vie for the title of Best Warwick Slider.
Boil 60 min
You can't see it, but the antique book is a book of Poems.
For my challenge inspiration, I used Flower Lili - isn't she just the sweetest thing?! I love Inky Impressions rubber stamps - fun to color with Copics and they stamp so well with very fine lines and details. The papers are Authentique's Gathering - perfect background paper for the sketch I used.
Questions are normally more helpful than answers; besides, what good would answers be without them?
For the second time in two days the market reacted negatively to a negative economic report. On thursday it was the ISM services decline, and today it was the Payrolls report. If you recall, on tuesday the market soared to SPX 1415 after the positive ISM manufacturing report. This market has certainly become news sensitive again these days.
How DARE Barack Obama so thoroughly disrespect the legacy of Ronald Reagan and try to slanderously steal the credibility that Reagan EARNED by standing for everything that Obama has stood against???
My day and week were rapidly getting away from me so yesterday's post is back in my idea file and today I am showing you my completed vest. The length of time I worked on this is not indicative of the pattern being complex. It really isn't hard, it is a 4 row repeat. I limited my time working on it to knitting sessions in the store. I don't have an issue with the rule about using yarn purchased at the store during knitting sessions, but I have so much yarn waiting at home from ...shhh...other shops, I needed to slow this project down.
“You are teasing out the material, your structure is already there,” he says. “It is useful when you are struggling in the middle – you can immediately see that a great scene might be meaningless to the rest of the story.”
Of the nine dogs, she said, three are pit bulls and two of those, Martha Goldfinch (a male) and Seymore (who is blind) had been chained.
And if the actions spell treason to the nation, is it also not a violation to our Constitutional Monarchy and Council of Rulers?
Maybe I should form my own movement – VGN: vegan without all the crap.
~ I'm trying not to think about leaving one of my schools...I told the bookkeeper that we weren't going to talk about it: if we don't talk about it, it's not going to happen!
Population Since 1960, the overall inhabitants has dropped in the U. s. Declares.
I shared in my journal, then with my principal. Then, Tuesday I asked every student I teach to reflect, to meaningfully reflect, about how I could better meet their learning needs. As well, I asked every student I teach about how they could better meet their own learning needs.
Alternatively try one of these green products:
For ere she reach'd upon the tide
Ik ben benieuwd wat jullie van mijn tasje vinden en alvast een fijne zondag gewenst! Ik ga morgen heerlijk in de tuin werken om deze lente- en zomerklaar te maken!
What do you think of my teapot I’ve created ……….
It is very obvious that Guan Eng’s remarks tantamount to threatening the schools concerned.
2. He watched her cautiously step back. (She cautiously stepped back.)
Frazer’s Fan Page already has over a thousand followers, all willing Jamie back; and the Jamie McCrimmon Appreciation Society is steadily growing in strength. So head over and join the mission now... as we all know Frazer would be only too willing.
“Like the Hunters?” Jack asked.
“Where did he go to school?”
Summer is right around the corner, but since I live in Florida, it's already beach weather, which means it's time to get those bikinis out and hit the beach for some good old Vitamin D! I have a lot of bathing suits, and I usually buy at least one or two new suits each year, and this year is no different.
It doesn’t matter if the drink is his or not, if it is in a cup, sport’s bottle, sippy cup, baby bottle, or bowl, he will drink it. He has learned to be sneaky about it, too. When no one is looking, he has made my brother-in-law’s coffee disappear as fast as his sister’s 16-oz sports bottle of water. Recently, after cooking some bacon, I had poured the grease into a glass canning jar to harden so I could dump it outside. After being distracted for a moment, I returned to the kitchen and discovered that A had somehow managed to get up on the counter, and drink some, before dumping the rest into the sink. His thoroughly oiled lips were a dead giveaway. While I don’t know how much he drank, it didn’t seem to affect him at all.
Vintage Inspiration Friday
It may be true that “you can’t go home again” — what we left behind is forever changed. Our future does not lie in our past. Yet, we can still learn from our past to create a new future, to come home again for the very first time, if you will. At our best, United Methodists are a people who give, who serve, who witness. Wesley’s vision of spreading scriptural holiness across the land may need some redefinition and translation, but it is a homecoming worth exploring. Our movement was never to build churches but to create community. Even communities that lacked a sanctuary to worship in often had a fellowship hall in which to gather for spiritual formation and Christian education. And the formation and education wasn’t “information” based, but experiential and practical — teaching people how to live their lives (behavior) not simple what to think (belief). Our focus didn’t used to be on what we shouldn’t do and shouldn’t be and shouldn’t believe — we didn’t have time to waste — but on what we could do and could be and could believe. Today we spend much time talking about what we don’t have, and what we can’t do and afford, and how much we’ve lost — what a bummer. We live in despair that The United Methodist Church might cease to exist, so instead of strategizing how we might most effectively be the hands and heart and voice of Christ, we focus on our processes, practices and procedures to preserve the institution.
Still awaiting word from landlord. Don't know yet if we have to move or
This is a recipe that I have tried a couple of times. Anyone who knows me at all will see that the recipe calls for beer and wonder what I could possibly be thinking. I hate beer. My mantra is “beer is yucky.” The first time I made this soup I chose to ignore the beer. I also used just plain diced tomatoes because I was making it for someone who is really sensitive to spicy foods. The result was pretty good. In fact, it was good enough that a couple months later people requested I make it again.
I want to recommend every track!
Today we are gonna deal with the ready made Validation Controls alvailable in ASP.NET. Here we go..
‘Cause I’m a woman
Session 7: 9 am – 10:15 am
Does it even matter what I put on here? Is there anyone reading? I know there is no one commenting (boo hoo :( ).
For Nick Mancini time stopped when he saw the terrified look on his younger brother Anthony's face as Agent Russo apprehended him during a botched armed bank robbery. Nick couldn't shake the gut wrenching pain deep inside him and his feelings of remorse and guilt because he was unable to protect his brother. He vowed to avenge the life sentence his brother received.
That said, Cameron doesn’t simply repackage the Hollywood Indian as blue aliens just so we can continue to traffic in the same old racial stereotypes; that is, unlike Lucas and Bay, Cameron doesn’t offer the stereotype as a source of derision or for our amusement, but so he can critique contemporary American culture as one that has lost its way.
Thanks to everyone who entered, especially loyal Scathing Weekly reader who went as far as to help promote Kylie and Wiley's giveaway.
How old is your first? She passed shortly after birth.
I don't talk to flowers, they talk to me and I gladly listen!
“I’ve come to realize that being a keeper of my home doesn’t require flawless perfection, and never has. It’s all about being a gift to my family and to the Lord through the small sacrifices I’ve made with a willing heart…”
he lifted them up and carried them all the days of old”
Back home, ate dinner, did homework, bedtime routine. All in all, it was a great day. Busy, but fun. And I got to spend the whole day with my sweetheart. He flies out tomorrow to Columbus to move all of our stuff here. While I'm looking forward to having a TON of time on the computer, I'll miss him. Hurry back honey - I"ll miss you :)
Cumberbatch and Miller alternated in the roles of Frankenstein and the Creature, so in deciding the best actor prize, the judges, made up of leading theatre critics, said it would have been "invidious" not to recognise both actors.
Also, fill out a piece of paper listing and describing any damages that you find to coincide with the pictures (my apartment requires this) and try to get your landlord to sign it. This will also help protect you from any charges.
Beldum cannot learn any moves by TM, HM, tutor, or breeding. In fact, it starts with Takedown, and that’s the only move it learns, until it evolves at level 20. Useless as it may seem, it evolves into Metagross, a pseudo-legendary.
I wouldn’t be giving anything away to say that Meade’s descent into herself is inevitable. Once Ben Ho is no longer always around to ground her, and with no parents present to hold her in check, it’s just a matter of time. Majid is no help – he’s going there in his own way too.
just lush luxuriant love
Now, don’t get flustered before I’ve even said anything controversial. All I’m asking you to accept at this point is the simple fact that bending a small metal spoon with your hands is entirely possible, and so is inaccurately claiming that you were using psychic powers to do it. Look, here’s Hugh Laurie doing exactly that:
How do you battle being discouraged when you write?
:: While in bed rest, because of the fucking placenta growing all old and calcified way too early, I have watched exactly 9 complete seasons of America's Next Top Model, and all I'm left with is this simple statement: "Tyra's no Oprah. Oh no she ain't." Great to know there's some substance to my life.
ligence on the part of the investigating officer, and if there is any, the provincial commissioner, Simon Mpempe, would determine the action to be taken,” said Mulaudzi.
HOLY MAGNOLIA! I was jumping for joy.
So I have made a decision. I have organised for Darby to have a reader. With his diagnosis he is allowed to have assistance to ensure he is not hindered by his "disability". You have to know, this has been a very tough decision for me. I have been experiencing a constant game of ping pong in my mind as I toss the pros and cons back and forth. One day I wake up thinking "it's no big deal". And the next day I wake up thinking "this is a very big freaking deal". Do I give him the assistance he needs or does that highlight his weaknesses further? Should we challenge him to learn how to manage and become innovative within his condition, or is that throwing him in with the sharks? Am I being an over-protective parent perceived as giving her son an advantage, or am I simply making sure there is minimal disadvantage?
Chris would not let them walk over the bridge because the wind was blowing so hard
Chapter Secretary – Julie McIver, Horizon Blue Cross Blue Shield
Ratatouille:
Kali learned to take her bottle through the 2" x 2" mesh opening that separates the keepers from the animals, but what's really impressive is that Jill learned to present the baby for bottle feeding. The trainers used a stuffed orangutan to teach Jill that when they gave a command she was supposed to bring the baby to the mesh, hold her up and the keeper would give the bottle through the mesh.
Mr. Gates is ranked the third wealthiest person on planet earth.
Unfortunately, they are often abused or neglected and this is why places like The PrimRose Donkey Sanctuary are a Godsend. Sheila Burns is its founder and saviour. The sanctuary and its volunteers are committed to the rescue, protection and rehabilitation of donkeys and other large farm animals in crisis. They are also trying to educate the public as many people believe that donkeys are stubborn, vicious or dumb which is not the case. I believe it all depends on how they are treated.
Stir the apple chunks, dates and HALF the hazelnuts into the flour mixture and mix well. Add the egg and butter mixture and stir in gently. (I added about 1tblsp milk here as the mixture seemed very stiff.)
Katia B defies categorisation, another reason to ignore platitudinous comments on lounge or chill-out music. Six producers are credited in her record and their ifluence is obvious. Her style ranges from furious up-tempo trip-hop, Tanto Faz Para o Amor, to laid-back piano-driven ballad Are You Sleeping?
Haruki Murakami - Kafka on the Shore - For those who know me well, you know I am a Murakami fan and have read almost all of them, but never this one, even though it's one of his most popular. I guess there is a time for everything. And boy was I ready for this one. I LOVE THIS BOOK!!! I love the idea of leaving books on my travels and picking up new ones, wondering who might be the next reader. This book I am still holding onto even though I finished yesterday. I am carrying it around as a bible. This book is not your average fiction read, this book is about life philosophy. Very unexpected the reader gets a line of something special on every page. There are several parallel stories which merge in the end. Each story has it's own touch of life lessons behind, in the way things are happening, as well as the actual writing. In one story a boy is running away from home and in unusual ways is finding learning in his way. In another story we are introduced to a ever so slightly retarded old man, who in his simple ways teaches the way things are in his world. His language very much contains mainly of questions which then reveal simple life philosophical statements, that are for anyone to hear. I sucked in this book so much. The individual stories are grabbing and one can not wait for the continuation. This characteristic I am used to by the author and happy to find in this book again in the most brilliant way. I will leave the book at some point as one can not afford the extra weight, but am looking forward to one day in my live picking it up again only to find the special lines. Here a sample of what I am talking about:
3 stalks spring onion ( shredded )
Perhaps the worst bit of Nanny State pandering on this site is thereaction game at which you must be the farmer catching eggs from his chicken. No I'm not kidding and this pile of shit is payed for by us the taxpayer!
This time, my dough rolled easily into neat little logs and went into the freezer for 2 hours. Slice, bake, and...pure chocolate bliss. My husband and his parents, who were over to watch the Super Bowl, could not guess the secret ingredient, but loved them anyway. I think I want to make some more and stash them in the freezer for all the middle-of-the-night feedings in my future. They say chocolate consumption makes for a mellow baby, so it can't hurt...
**Note : For information, Shirataki has zero calories and no carbohydrates. So those who are trying to lose weight can integrate this in their diet menu.
What are the odds on United winning 6-1 and securing the title in the derby? I’ll take that bet.
So now I'm busy with the garden, and trying to walk with Lottie as much as possible, as well as all the usual family and home commitments, I really have no time for knitting or crochet... but somehow I squeeze it in ;) I even squeeze in a bit of browsing for the next pattern... I'm really wanting to make this simple summer boatneck vest. If you're on Ravelry do have a look at the ones other people have made - the neck just seems to drape beautifully. And I just happen to have some cotton kapok DK in pastel colours which I think would be lovely, though I'll have to do stripes as I don't have enough of one colour. Must finish this cowl quickly though, or it'll have to wait till next winter to be worn!
The ruin is always some kind of fortification; a stone wall (all traces of timber or other organic materials long gone) built to withstand weather and attack – or anything that might threaten the surplus stored up against another long winter of privation. But of course the castle – or other stone ruin, like the ring fort, which is built on the same principle – defends ownership in quite particular ways. It is not just the result of an intelligent animal building protection around the fruits it has gathered from the autumn harvest; the stone wall always also represents divisions amongst different ranks and kinship alignments of the people. Put simply, you’re either in or you’re out. The castle is the property of the king, who profits from having managed the land, or the prince or lord who has ordered the countryside into submission. Their position of privilege means they can take the pick of the next generation for improved breeding. They are prepared to kill to protect their wealth; and we all know that defense begins with surveillance, which soon turns to attack (aka the pre-emptive strike). The driving force is power, specifically power over, in this case political/technological power over other people, the land and its creatures.
upon a time, but that was 40 years ago. These days we get festering loads of ass like this. The Unborn just reeks of phoned in, phony horror from people who wouldn’t know something scary if it came up and bit them. This movie is just horrible. And I can’t wait to get this over with, so let’s get started!
Watched a channel other than NBC on TV and visited NBC.com on a computer
Walsworth and Peterson were not available for comment on March 20 after the hearing.
As big as Google is, you'd think they'd
“I’m afraid you are right Alice. If I get all of you out you have to promise me that you’ll stop Bellamy.”
Next time you have to make a delivery, and want to pick up a few extra bucks delivering somebody else’s stuff, consider using uShip. Hell, I’m thinking about throwing together an old propane-powered pickup and making a few deliveries myself…
In BUSH’s first year in office, the White House chief economist, N. Gregory Mankiw, warned that the government’s “implicit subsidy” of Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac, combined with loans to unqualified borrowers, was creating a huge risk for the entire financial system.
As you can see I have this rather quirky fear of waiting on the editor. Honestly, I don’t know why. They will like my writing or not, my worth as a writer is not tied up in that one story or whatever the response is. In fact, some of the best critiques I have received have been from editors who took the time to tell me why my story was not accepted, in a kind and constructive way.
We have had over 2 inches of rain on the island since early this morning and we are still expecting more, so today is very slow for any fishing. We do still have some hardy folks giving it a shot this morning along the beach but with wind expected to increase to 25-30 mph, I think we shall see most head indoors for the afternoon. Yesterday, however, was a great day for fishing on the island with temperatures in the low 70s and sunny. The ocean was calm and beautiful. We had reports nice catches of sea mullets, pufferfish, scattered puppy drum, 1 to 2 pound bluefish as well as a larger blue, and even several pompano for those using shrimp or sand fleas.
* 1 tablespoon minced garlic
There were also more sobering items on the list—Vitamin D in 250 times the usual dose, to offset the lack of exposure to the sun. Waterproof shoes and clothing made with copper fibers to prevent the growth of bacteria and fungi. A variety of medical vaccines, to be administered by a miner who had, fortunately, had some medical training. A 2,000-calorie daily diet, made up of half actual food and half energy shakes, and 5 liters of water per person per day. Thirty-three mini Bibles, one for each of the trapped miners as their thoughts invariably turned to something larger than themselves.
Favourite Story:
As she spoke, she brandished the sabre and lunged at the throat of her errant suitor,
Adieu, my dear heart!
Cast on 30 stitches and join for knitting in the round with the magic loop technique or your DPNs.
But I'm sorry I don't pray that way
My lovely wife asks for a pair of empanadas. When it arrives, she additionally requests of our waiter to have him bring her a side dish of salsa so that she may further enhance the flavor of her meal.
I experienced separation anxiety yesterday...
REPORTER: Front page?
GF
Today I wondered, a) how well specified is the transceiver for this sort of high duty operation, and b) what limits should I impose on TX power for modes that require linearity (eg PSK31). On the normal "ham bands" it is usually bad to use too much power for PSK31, partly due to concerns of spectral broadening in case of poor IMD, but mainly due to concerns of receiver overload & AGC action when many stations are operating in a small slice of spectrum. These concerns are not so important on 5MHz, if the channel is mainly empty, and signals are weak - in these circumstances it is appropriate to increase power to a level that allows the QSO, until the acceptable level of IMD products is reached.
Always remember.
If you’re looking to grab something quick on your lunch break, a seemingly fancy restaurant like Cafetasia might not catch your eye. But that’s one of the charms of Cafetasia, it has all the ambiance without the prices. The restaurant is very spacious with plenty of seating, though sometimes in the afternoons at lunch the restaurant gets incredibly busy.
Now, imagine fat-cat editors in Utusan, B. Harian, etc having their say in full view of their audience (whilst trying to keep a straight face) and juxtapose it with the double-speak we get from BN politicians when they are on national TV.
What is great about The Archers is if I don't listen for a while and then I do, it's like I've never been away. I went off to the States in the mid 1970's for 4 years and never listened once, then turned the radio on on my return, and all the characters were still there, doing what they do. Of course there are new ones every now and again, but it's so easy to pick up again. Real easy listening!
L’oreal HiP Color Truth Cream Liner in Black
Icewolf: The most perfect abstract character combination in existence.
poverty
Until the next sniff, sip or quaff,
3. Showing Off on Personal Blogs. Blogs are an excellent platform for candidates to showcase their hobbies, writing and communication skills, and general interests. Think they’re just for marketing candidates? Think again. Even a meat cutter at Whole Foods can run a successful butcher blog to establish expertise and share experience with an avid audience. And candidates for and candidates for artistic positions can showcase their portfolio of work.
Oh, the picture above is of the spring overspill and the watercress that grows there. I guess the recent bout of warm weather has brought it forth. I picked some today and was amazed to taste it was already hot! Normally it stays mild until the weather gets really warm.
“The T.V.” He didn’t turn around. “Just the T.V., alright?” His voice wilted, as if he were pleading with me. I found this to be the most unappealing moment of our short partnership. Jason was a seasoned burglar; myself a novice. I had wrongly assumed that, during his long stint in this vocation, he must have encountered almost every situation thinkable. By the broad nature of his boasts, I was sure he was a master, but now I realized that I was merely a naïve victim of his overly exaggerated showmanship.
The Court of Justice considered that the referred question was, for all essential purposes, answered by the judgment in Medeva (C-322/10) and therefore delivered a Reasoned Order. The Court's language is closely modelled on that used Medeva and concludes that Article 3(a) precludes the grant of a SPC relating to active ingredients which are not specified in the wording of the claims of the basic patent. The ruling of the Court is therefore as follows:
LOVE. Nothing new here. Still living alone. Still looking for the love of my life to appear somewhere where I least expect it to be found. Hasn’t really been looking that much. Kind of given up on that, but some hope still lingers I guess. Sometimes I wonder why I bother at all but somehow I think life has not been complete without some kind of love happening at least once. Maybe a naive idea but there it is.
Beyond that, it was apparent to anyone watching and listening to Barack Obama that a moron was running for office; one willing to say anything for five minute’s advantage. He literally lied his way into the Oval Office.
Stephanie Brookfield, who is standing for Labour in the Earcroft ward of Darwen in May’s elections, was arrested at Wolverhampton Wanderers’ Molineux stadium on Saturday.
And one final picture of the day. The Jensen girls.
Inhale that fire that sucks you dry
Seth J. Albano, story - Renato Arlem, art - ?, cover
At L FOR LAZARUS, we love people who follow fashion but have developed their own style. And to love fashion or style, it kinda makes sense that you also have to love the human form.
Selebi's spokesperson, Sally de Beer, said the commissioner was not prepared to comment on the matter.
We check in our hotel, Tesco is just right beside the hotel.
The next club open event is at Delph SC, near Bolton / Bury in Manchester
aka ABBIE IS VISITING ME!!!!
Magazines face out from the wall
Go The Keys
I had two baby showers; one from family and one from my coworkers. Both were beautiful (I hope to post pictures soon) and we received some very generous gifts.
3) Make revisions to my non-fiction project based on feedback and my own editing of it. - The person who is planning to look at the first draft of the main portion of this project is intending to get to reviewing it in the next few days. Once I get that feedback, I'll see about trying to move forward with it.
What do I tell my friend?
It wasn’t far to the Underground station. If she focused on thinking about good things, she would be there before she knew it and then she would feel foolish for being so nervous. She smiled when she thought about her leaving party. She had worked for the company for years, but it was time for a change and she couldn’t wait to start her new life. In only a few weeks, she would be working in Paris. She would be able to see her brother more often and would be able to soak up a different culture. It seemed like a dream and she was so caught up in it that she didn’t care about all the work she still had to do—the crash course in French, even though it was a British firm she was going to work for and there would be English speakers there, all the packing and things she had to arrange.
2. Provide exercise
Before we go much further into this, I just want to chat about some of the places where Hofstede’s theories and models don’t quite hold up. For one thing, we all know that culture is a multi-faceted and multi-dimensional thing that can’t possibly be simplified down to five points of difference, no matter how broad. Another, more serious, flaw is that it categorises by country, broadly stating that because you are Australian or Japanese or (insert relevant country here) your culture is this. And that’s just not true.
Name: BOYZ NITE OUT K-POP FESTIVAL
The answer, in a short phrase is a resounding “Yes.”
Do they have to see the photo immediately after you take it?
Sometimes I will ramble on to Joette about the stupidest things...things that are seriously not that important but my sub conscience must need to fill space and time with verbal nothingness to give me a sense of security or something...example: I will talk to Joette about different types of wood...yes, wood and neither Joette and I really honestly care about the different types of wood but maybe I just want to feel smart for a second or something. Joette will just listen. She will just listen and yet love me the same...because pine is softer than oak...and even though that is weird, I can always feel safe with Joette.
Curried Chicken Pizza with Feta
Then we're introduced to our main characters. Relatives of the Strode family who adopted Laurie, they live in the Myers house. The father is an abusive asshole who is so one-dimensionally angry and grouchy that I actually think he is zero-dimensional. I seriously can't even make jokes about this guy; the movie makes them all for me. He shouts at everyone and everything, slaps and insults his own family and I don't think I've ever seen a character more worthy of being murdered in a slasher movie, ever. The mother is a complete joke and a push over, letting everyone step all over her and push her around. Yeah, because nobody has any depth to them as characters. Everyone is just black or white, with no in-between area and no reason or motivation for anything they do. Every person can be summed up with one word adjectives and bam! You have your movie. God, what a load. The lead girl is completely faceless and unmemorable, as is her son, who is supposedly the next heir of this Michael Myers curse thing, except I don't give a rat's ass. It's really kind of hard to do that when we're barely given any reason to care about these morons in the first place. I've sat in wading pools less shallow and substance-less.
... and I have forgotten so many more. Where have your daydreams been taking you recently?
Both events were great. 4 Thunder Bolts for both of them!!!!
A home that saw much laughter and much love. And some squabbles along the way. And some tears. And some heartache. All the things that make a house a home. All the things that make a gaggle of people a family.
court room, making my case to the judge alongside my dad and attorney.
Me: I agree with Child #2. It's really a very positive fortune.
Key Players: Austin Rivers (15.3 ppg), Seth Curry (13.4 ppg), Ryan Kelly (11.8 ppg, 5.4 rpg), Mason Plumlee (11 ppg, 9.3 rpg), Andre Dawkins (8.8 ppg), Miles Plumlee (7 rpg)
Melissa Gilbert fell and broke her back in 2010 and was walking with a walker. I can't believe how well she moves now and didn't realize someone could recover from a broken back like that. That jive is very physical, and she is really doing well. (Side note: I just love watching Maks move! He's hot standing still, too.) They danced the jive to "The Dog Days Are Over" and were great! (24)
He has no power.
The beautiful scalloped border on the red checked paper was made with the NEW Tonic Studios
Remember, people will let you down, divide your heart and hurt you but when you are pleasing to God, He will never hurt you or fall short of His promises! If you are hurt or facing condemnation from being a people pleaser, then who is to blame? You are for trusting in man and not God! Be blessed and may you heed to God’s message to you today.
But if God is helping people with alcoholic problems to get out of their dependency, HE will also help me to not find comfort in chocolate! That is my hope and prayer.
When does learning begin? As I explain in the talk I gave at TED, learning starts much earlier than many of us would have imagined: in the womb.
This is what the inebriate seemed to be seeking and he sat down opposite the man. “AN ANSWER IS REQUIRED!” screamed he (“screamed he” seems more appropriate than “he screamed” in this case).
When we change little things about our appearance, they can make a big difference. Last year, I completely revolutionized my hair by changing the part. My whole life, I'm fighting with a natural part that starts over my left eye and angles back kind of diagonally. No amount of product was really effective--by the end of the day, it always kind of went back to this weird part. So one day I just let it happen. Suddenly, my hair takes half the time to do, and I'm able to envision doing other things with my hair. Right now? Growing out bangs. I've had bangs of some sort for as long as I've had hair. And they don't lie flat. The part goes right through them and it just doesn't work. Instead of fighting with it, I'm going to see what happens if I let it win.
After watching the very gorgeous Noel Solomon create her beautiful paper roses on the Martha Stewart program it got me thinking that a few paper decorations could make my Easter table extra pretty...
and dowsing us again, again,
All flows, nothing stays.
It was good to try such a wide range from different areas, there were wines from:
If there's one part of Thing 2 that big fans of Thing 1 will love, it is of course the sequence during the end credits. When the movie "ended" the first time, I had a few seconds to go, "Wait, what? How can that be the end? What about the guys in the helicopter and the d-- ohhhhhhhh... there you go!" It's nothing all that big but I'm sure it was greatly appreciated by those who know and love Thing 1 (which now includes me!).
Hey y’all.
But memories intrude – the pure sensuality of what they once shared, the pain of parting … And she has to deal with another man from her past, while his celebrity status makes him the focus of unwanted attention.
Four Names to Remember for Luxury Watches
It's been a few weeks since my last post I know, I know. I am just going to show case a card and envelope I made using our latest sponsor Thebearyscrap! I am telling you I have never played with tear bears before, but I am getting all kinds of hooked! The images she sells range from pigs to mice, skunks and yes Bears! She even has a tutorial that breaks everything down for you step by step.
So I was just wondering, … would I actually be attractive to the kind of person I would be interested in? Those were my “more thoughts” on the matter! :)
The mechanism I used to create this, is actually -- a store bought card! Yep, the blue background has a white tab that pulls when the card is opened to create the sound already built into the original card. I simply cut the card to fit the size of my book and created all my own thematic embellishments using my Cricut.
Reading: Endre and I are enjoying a couple of chapters each night before bedtime with Hugo in The Invention of Hugo Cabre. I think it's a wonderful book so far. So, those of you who have seen the movie - is it any good? I really hope so, but I often think the books are better than the movies...
Flatten about half-way with the bottom of a glass. The dough will probably have cracks around the edges. If any of them start to crumble apart just gently press them back together.
The world is on the brink of an economic and financial crisis. A lack of an understanding of human nature led to the fall of communism in the 1980’s, and now the ‘endless growth paradigm’ in a world of finite resources, [coupled to the self-same lack of understanding vis-à-vis human nature] is pushing capitalism toward the same path – collapse. To distract the ‘general public’ from the apocalyptic anxieties of the Euro-Crisis and the American Debt-Crisis, and their own problems [unemployment and rising commodity prices] a plan is hatched by ‘the-men-behind-the curtain’. Much frantic work is required behind the scenes [without public introspection as to the reality of the situation], to shore up the economy, so a distraction is created. A small cabal of espionage operatives are dispersed [in ‘hoodies’ and ‘gangster rap’ garb] in an operation across UK cities to spark / incite ‘small to medium scale’ civil disorder, which taps into the “under-classes / economically disadvantaged” and “criminals / gangs” who mount ‘copy-cat’ attacks as looting and rioting spreads in English inner-cities, with the police under instructions to take a ‘softly, softly’ approach. ‘Social Media’ is harnessed to encourage and fan the flames of disorder. The world media focus its fish-eye lens onto the British riots, thus keeping the real news, the economic crisis away from the centre of the camera. The ‘men-behind-the curtain’ can now work away with reduced public introspection, and the general public and ‘chattering classes’ get distracted from their current problems of unemployment, lack of job security, increased costs of energy, public-sector cutbacks, higher taxation – focusing instead on the moral issues behind these riots, brewing up ‘racism’ as humans always like someone to blame. The public demands use of water canon, rubber bullets, harsh punishments for the looters, clamp downs and restrictions on ‘social media’, even ‘hanging’ and agrees that we must give up more of our civil liberties, and freedoms as a cost we have to accept for our own safety. The mission creep toward the fascist society Orwell imagined in 1984 comes closer to reality.
Personally, I try to do all things that glorify God and I cannot see drinking hard liquor as glorifying God.
The architecture was amazing, though. I was glad to be inside the museum and look around. I think the museum itself is the best sculpture of all the ones inside it. At least the building looks like a ship from the side and a flower from the top (awesome). Some of the sculptures... ...I just don´t know.
And yet they are not three eternals: but one eternal.
Double Chocolate Coca Cola Cake
5. Put a spoonful of the batter onto the pan and flatten it.
No, seriously. The men who had special compartments inside their asses for bullshit, the men who saw the Devil in every Democrat’s home, the men who can get away with misbranding and misinforming the populace of the United Goddamn States of Motherfucking America (our nation’s proper name), were seriously considered to be plausible world leaders because they kicked the very concept of idiocy’s ass so fucking hard, it stopped existing. There are no idiots anymore, because the idiots of past have soaked up all of the potential buffoonery. We need to invent a new world for stupid people, because none of them will ever be worthy of sharing a title with the Fantastic Four.
Complete Description:
But look at ANY sport. Steroids or no, the players of today are bigger, heavier, and stronger on average. We know more about how contact in these sports effects the human body, especially concussions. Not to mention players and coaches know a lot more about strength conditioning than the players and coaches of years past.
Dad gets the list together every week. He goes through the Shopper (our local free paper) and the local news paper, as well as listening to Radio Trade-io (local station 2DU lets you put free ads on air). He then enters them all into a spreadsheet, sorts them by location in town ie. North, South, East or West, and puts in details of start time or items of interest at the sales.
Ventricular assist devices
Heal grief. Our old memories of loss and pain can keep us trapped in the past, so it is important to work actively to heal those wounds and free up the energy they store. Use journaling, counseling, group therapy, or a letting-go ritual to help release old grief.
Answer: This is a very long story, but I will try and sum it up in a few sentences. Joshua and I both reached a point in our life where we started wanted more than a fancy paycheck. We realized the old cliche of “money doesn’t bring you happiness” is true. We weren’t happy with ourselves even though we had everything society told us would make us happy. Once we realized this, we were unsure of what the important things in our lives were. Then we found minimalism. We saw it as a tool to use to help us prioritize our lives.
Zivjeli!
Atheists, does displaying a manger really equate to making a law respecting an establishment of religion? Does a single display really violate the separation of church and state?
* I received a copy of Sunshine to facilitate my candid and honest review. No other form of compensation was or will be given. All personal views are my own!
g) It is better for bank employees to wear black ties than blue ties.
Participants were given words printed in colour and had to say the colour of each word, ignoring what the word itself said. In the classic version of the test, the words are all themselves colour names.
In addition, ladies, Darwin didn’t lose his faith because he discovered natural selection; he dumped God because he couldn’t stomach the doctrine of eternal accountability and damnation. That’s what made him switch teams. I think that was about ten years after he had married his first cousin. Git-R-Done, Charlie!
Adam Sandler – “No, I’m not married. I was engaged once, and she broke my heart. I carry this ring around with me all the time. Sometimes, and I’m not proud of this, I show it to girls to get sympathy. Not my proudest moment, but at least I didn’t do that with you, right?”
Well, as you probably all know from my previous blogs and my support of Brett in the November 2011 live debate organised by MX Publishing, I regard Brett to be the ultimate Holmes. Therefore, husband’s comments were met with a sceptical rising of one eyebrow and a look which said, “don’t even go there unless you want a night on the sofa.’
Tues - Stuffed Chicken Breasts with Mashed Potatoes - Stuffed with breadcrumbs and cheese then bakes in a tomato sauce. Comes ready to be baked
Don't be afraid to use the weather to add contrast. Unusual pairings, especially when drawing attention to the Character's emotions, is a powerful trigger for tension. Consider how the bleak mood of a character is even more noticeable as morning sunlight dances across the crystals of fresh snow on the walk to work. Or how the feeling of betrayal is so much more poignant on a hot summer day. Likewise, success or joy can be hampered by a cutting wind or drizzling sleet, foreshadowing conflict to come.
At this point, he clearly just gave up trying to make sense of the situation. Just like the one before him. And the one before that. He didn't believe us either. None of them do.
Olive oil: to grease the mold
If she gets pregnant, she’s stopping herself “in the middle of the road of life,” he said.
An Idea she had for a mural of the moon and a howling wolf on the wall next to her bed has since been
to laugh back.
And yet, sometimes a certain concern will come along and I find myself chewing away at that old bone of fretfulness again. It concerns a loved one who just can't seem to get their act together. Who slides along in life without putting any effort forth to better their position or quality of life. And everyone around this person wants to see them succeed, wants to see them get some kind of vision of moving on into the here and now and quit dwelling on the past. To realize we're all getting mentally exhausted from trying to help them keep it together. To realize we're not going to be here forever to keep coming behind them and straightening their life out. To know how frustrating it is to pitch in to try to help, only to know we'll be right back at square one in a month or two. To know how angry it makes us to take time out of our own busy schedules to help with things that would take very little effort on their part to keep under control. We all spend a considerable amount of time trying to figure out how we can help this person realize they need more help than we have to offer anymore.
We come to realize that there were wealthy Blacks and that welfare was established for white citizens and that even today, whites make up the majority of welfare recipients.
Zen was a bit of afraid and shocked but Ashi was expecting it. He was waiting for this moment, to be a student in Galbaria or at least in the other two primary schools since somewhat they’re connected. He was wondering and still believing that his father was still working on Galbaria. And to be able to see his parents again, Galbaria was one step ahead.
Oops....nearly forgot.....I aged my piece of UTEE with a little black paint dabber as it was a bit too orange....I love orange but not that much!!!
It was like that the other night. I was in a chat room having a nice chat with my beautiful friend, laughing and having a good time, when suddenly it hit me: I have no idea what more to say, no idea at all. Of course I didn’t stop typing just because I didn’t know what more to say. Instead I kept on typing and somehow words came out that made some kind of sense, had a meaning and kept the convo going. I was happy to have gotten through without falling silent.
Note: YOU GUYS. I am so nervous. This post has sat in my drafts for a few weeks now and I just kind of feel like it's time. For no other reason except it's going to stretch me. It's a side of myself I think I'd like to let out of the box, but I'm a nervous wreck. This is good for me and a WAY smaller deal than I'm making it out to be. Thanks for reading and please, if you disagree or think that I'm a terrible citizen, just be nice about it. Thanks!
That's right, you guessed it! My very favorite thing to do with my kiddies at the end of the year is blowing bubbles in the school yard. I always keep it a secret until the last week so that they don't expect it. (I've been able to pull this secret off every year simply because I have been teaching at different schools so my kiddies never know what's coming!)
You don't wanna miss it, so don't! 9 PM PST sharp kids....
"All women should be having regular Botox right Kate?" At which point I spilt my coffee all over my desk.
Downloading media content for free has been the national pastime since the advent of Napster in 2000. The rise in peer-to-peer programs opened a Pandora's Box of illegal delights which the RIAA, MPAA and FBI have tried desperately ever since to extinguish, but as the trend grew more ubiquitous and media conglomerates more out of touch with the times, the artistic community learned to utilize the online network for their own ends. The underground success and mainstream assimilation of such flagrantly illegal musicians as Danger Mouse and Girl Talk proved that the market had changed since the litigation-happy days of John Oswald and Negativland, when the record industry still had the clout to squelch even the slightest affront to its Draconian system of copyright law. With a perfect storm brewing, it was only a matter of time before the major players took part.
The ingredients used:
- Etsy
Wine: Château du Nozet
But now, at last, Obama has done the right thing. And I am, despite my obvious penchant for sarcasm and overall crankiness, in my heart an optimist about the ability of humanity to strive toward a better world. And I think sometimes we need th
oh, sweet pup.
and derision, through to final victory in the greater contest to come.
‘Program Anak Emas Pulau Pinang’ is expected to cost the state government up to RM10mil annually.
We’ve met some really nice packs at the park, like the Iggy+Iggy+Whippet in the early afternoon crew and the Deerhound+Iggy+Iggy trio that Bowpi has flirted with in the past. One of the most exciting, and difficult groups to photograph (to me) is the Whippet+Whippet+(+Whippet?)+Iggy+Iggy+Iggy+Silken Windhound pack that I have tried so often to capture, all in vain.
This would apply to the copyright legislation and prevent any possible difference between Scotland and England in the application of copyright law.
The story of a SEAL whistle-blowing about war crimes and Project Looking Glass was scripted, possibly by Kerry because of its film-narrative structure: the wild card loose cannon former solider on the run, the pretty love story, danger and international intrigue, assassins and double agents…
One thing I don’t do that I have seen others do is include the grade sheet with the reassessment when I give it to students. I also don’t have the learning objectives listed next to each problem. Part of what I want to see is if students can determine in which contexts they need to use a certain skill. I don’t want a student to know they need to use Newton’s Third Law because it is one of the learning objectives. I do run into complaints occasionally when a student only needs to reassess on one learning objective but they don’t know which problem relates to it. My reply is that if you understand the concepts you can determine which problems are relevant. That has worked pretty well so far.
Yesterday, I mentioned a moment during which I tried to pry one of my fingernails from its bed. Even though I didn’t completely tear it out, I did rip about a third of it off. My experiences with this finger today demonstrated to me that, without doubt, my mind must go somewhere else whenever I attempt any self-harm.
Young Bae and Kang Suk join Hang Ah’s group and they all arrived in Seoul. They had a courtesy call to the King and he warmly greeted them alongside the North Korean General. On the other hand, Jae Ha finally concludes his military duties and an officer gladly gave him an insignia as a symbol of gratitude for his Majesty’s hard work. Jae Ha gladly signed the certificates handed to him thinking its all over. To his surprise, his journey has just begun. Poor thing, 2 years with Military men just can’t seem to change this stubborn and obnoxious fellow.
Here are a few random thoughts coming from the brain of Tenessa.
Do you repurpose other art supplies for use on stamped cards? I mean, Copics and Sharpies weren't invented for stamping, but lots of stampers use them now. I've used mat board and canvas on cards, too. So, what are your favorite non-stamp-specific art supplies to use on cards?
I just really hope when we have kids people wont think I'm the babysitter! ugh
As one iron shapes another iron, the pure mind of a person which makes efforts in the virtuous path should correct and mold his impure mind. Mind is unfailingly rendered pure through true, virtuous and pure actions and constant association with the wise. Speaking the truth and practice of pure compassion are very great purifiers of mind. All lofty aspirations, all-embracing tendencies and pity will go a long way in increasing the Sattvic nature of the mind. The higher Mind is developed.
‘tie a belt around it and wear it with my tapered chinos’ – girl aged approximately 25 years old
My last words will probably be… It’s been fun.
For receiving this award I must tell you, in alphabetical order, 26 things about me and pass the award on to other bloggers. That seems more than fair. Not easy, but fair.
Universals and specifics
Once you’ve totaled up your monthly income and your monthly expenses, subtract the expense total from the income total to get the difference. A positive number indicates that you’re spending less than you earn–congratulations. A negative number indicates that your expenses are greater than your income. This means you will need to trim your expenses in order to begin living within your means.
September 19 - Mary Jane Miller, children's author ("Me and My Name"), 75
In 1829 a Londoner called Samuel Jones became the first to commercially exploit the matches. Like Walker he did not patent the matches or the name by which he marketed them: 'Lucifers'. Many other chemists made and sold their own 'Lucifers' and the name stuck, much to the annoyance of Walker who so disliked the name that he stopped selling his own invention during the 1830s.
Scholastic Corporation (NASDAQ: SCHL) is the world’s largest publisher and distributor of children’s books and a leader in educational technology and services and children’s media. Scholastic creates quality educational and entertaining materials and products for use in school and at home, including children's books, magazines, technology-based products, teacher materials, television programming, film, videos and toys. The Company distributes its products and services through a variety of channels, including proprietary school-based book clubs and school-based book fairs, retail stores, schools, libraries, television networks and the Company’s Internet Site, www.scholastic.com.
I had it all lined up to share, so here are the initials of another buddy, SB - whaddya think?
“If I am only able to deliver one message to the Prime Minister, it is this: please don’t let your policies be dictated by uneducated, disgruntled locals! Singapore did not become a prosperous country by catering to the lowest common denominator!”
"The bidding has started up again and prices are rising. Now, as the dust settles from the art-market upheaval of the last few years, a new art landscape is emerging.
vision of exotic fauna & flora, the place is painted with the natural beauty of its surrounding… open invitation to discover the splendor of the panoramic view of Tamarin & Flic en Flac beach from the far horizon…
3.Puree the tomato and keep aside.
In the days that follow, Hannah struggles with unspeakable feelings of sorrow and rage—feelings that fuse into one chilling purpose for living: revenge against Brian Wesley, the drunk driver who has caused all her pain.
Police response distracts from genuine issues
Two domestic workers, Patricia Moyo, 29, and Tracey Khalima, 27, had vanished with the gang, and the fear at first was that they had been kidnapped. But it did not take long for the the Trio Task Team from the Alexandra cluster to consider them suspects and track them down to a flat in Hillbrow. The women, one of whom had been with the family for two years, were caught with the family's jewellery and cash.
I can’t remember when exactly I decided to propose to her, but I know I’d been thinking of it for a while. My biggest hang-up was not having a ring. Of course I wanted to do it right and have a nice shiny ring to give her, but those things are pricey! Finally I’d saved up enough and decided that the moment had arrived. But first I had to decide which shiny pretty thing to get her. That’s where a couple of her friends come in. I enlisted them as my secret agents to help me pick out her newest piece of jewelry. After a few dozen emails back and forth the decision was made!
Okay, okay...sorry. Story One ends and GhostBobby gives his approval...if his stuttering "shshshshsh"s are any indication. So since that went so well, Shirley starts reading another story from The Book of King James.... I mean from The Quadead Book.
Britain at the moment feels like a place which is more about cuts and closures, pessimism and pratfalls, than optimism, imagination and investment. We're all learning that we can't depend on institutions- companies, government, the media - to make good or positive decisions. But we're all in charge of our own response to bad news, and, without sounding impossibly mawkish, mine is to face the future with a hopeful smile. And get writing. The stakes just got higher.
His first three Davison stories form a somewhat directionless arc that is long on compelling images and short on any sort of structure that holds them together. Parkhouse gestures continually at an alternate conception of Gallifrey - one very much in tune with the one that Moore sets up in his “Time War” triptych. But he never develops it and leaves vast tracks of plot unresolved.
Applicants Sought for Bloomington Arts Commission
A volunteer is someone who willingly gives up their time in order to help those in need. They are not looking for anything in return, but many guests agreed that it felt nice to be appreciated. Our Volunteers. Our Superheroes. They work in all areas of volunteering at Friends of Hospice Ottawa; in-home visits, special events, transportation, caregiver support, bereavement support, day hospice, office, knitting, baking, special events, PR, web support and more. Our volunteers are truly today’s superheroes who often work in the shadows - behind the scenes, their deed un-noticed except by those they serve and by those they serve with. Our Volunteer Appreciation Night gave us a chance to celebrate the volunteers who work to better the lives of people in our community.
German HC band Cox-Orange is next. They released a 7" on Amok Records.
I was thinking recently about how Leibniz accounted for the phenomenon of time. On an A theory of time, it is easy to account for the phenomenon of one event succeeding another; namely one simply appeals to ontology, because events really do ontologically come into, and go out of, existence. I’ve outlined before that the A theory of time is problematic for a Catholic (in particular because it implies that God can “learn things” in a qualified sense which dissolves the classical Catholic doctrine of God’s Metaphysical Simplicity).
I used to measure the days, but as I get older, I just let the blur do its work, and I ride the crest of the wave. Who cares how much scenery is behind me, or even how much is ahead? She wasn’t the first or the last to wear at me. The lines are muddied, and the extremes have been capped. I’m quite sure that I’m dull now, like a pencil that has written too much. What could I manage to scratch and scribble for an old correspondence? If she were to call me today, would I even remember that I had once been under her skin, and she under mine? Would there be an echo of angst–a trace of pheromone locked in the bloodstream of time–or just a hollow banging noise, like a severed hand dropping into an empty bucket. (You’ve been caught stealing love and the punishment is swift and severe.)
Minimal attendance at Parliament, especially in Glenda Jackson’s case, does not seem to be a bar to being re-elected.
And while these versions of THAT friend are generally nice, watch out if your girlfriend ever rises to the interesting level of the snotty accomplished bitch. It’s like Highlander in THAT friend world: there can be only one.
No, I don't mean we should have more than one spouse at a time. I actually mean that one spouse is not expected to be everything and everyone to meet our needs. Yet, for women my age, it was a definite expectation.
I sure hope to have the rest of the unit ready tomorrow evening,
No matter how rough things got at home, Dad continued
WHERE? The Triangle park, 46th and Lamar
For a time, before I wised up and started fashioning it myself, I used to go to the hairdressers opposite the five-star hairdressers – just hoping that a little of the glamour would rub off through close proximity – and I know what they charged, so I hate to think what a premium haircut used to cost.
Not my mom, but friend Julie who is my upline....she's amazing!
It’s a really good way to allow members to contribute and it can lead to action. In 2008 the policy I pitched (on funding maternity service to enable mothers to stay in maternity centres until breast feeding was established) became party policy and was funded in the first Budget after National became government.
If they aren’t pokey,
He dumped the entire vial into the cookie dough and started mixing. I could smell the cloud of peppermint from across the table. As I prepped the next batch, he handed me a tiny ball of dough and we both bit down.
Wandering Vines
Sean Penn – Jeff Spicoli
And I got to take their pictures... and we all lived Happily Ever After.
she goes there.' His eyes were so sad while saying
1. Open the nearest door and slowly recite “Whenever I find myself growing grim about the mouth; whenever it is a damp, drizzly November in my soul; whenever I find myself involuntarily pausing before coffin warehouses, and bringing up the rear of every funeral I meet: and especially whenever my hypos get such an upper hand of me, that it requires a strong moral principle to prevent me from deliberately stepping into the street, and methodically knocking people’s hats off–then, I account it high time to get to sea as soon as I can.”
The magnetosphere is a bubble of magnetism that surrounds the Earth and protects us from the Solar Wind.
While I generally enjoyed this movie there were a few things that did get up my nose. These mostly involved the inclusion of footage from the 1939 Henry King film. The train robbery sequence blends in fairly seamlessly but another example proved especially distracting to me. During the well filmed Northfield raid, as the lead flies and men are falling all around, Frank and Jesse take the time to ride into an alley and divest themselves of their long dusters. Why, you might well ask, would two men caught in a firefight pause to do this? Well, the answer is that we’re about to see recycled footage of Power and Fonda riding through a plate glass window and later jumping their horses off a cliff – and our heroes hadn’t been wearing dusters in the ’39 film! Now those scenes were great the first time round but it smacks of a certain cheapness to wheel them out here again. Another problem I had was at the end of the film. You know that Bob Ford is going to shoot Jesse as he stands on a chair to straighten that picture. Well, here Ford gives it to him in the back of the head at point blank range - and instead of dropping to the floor like a sack of potatoes, Jesse swivels around to glare reproachfully at his assassin before succumbing to his wound. Bah!
1) Bring a pot of salted water to a boil. Meanwhile, heat the olive oil in a large skillet
Several days later his friend Al, who runs Al's diner, calls him to tell him an unbelieveable secret. Inside his storage room is a portal to 1958. Jake thinks Al is joking until he goes through the "rabbit hole" and finds himself back in 1958. Returning back to 2011 he finds that Al has told him about the portal for a single reason; he wants Jake to go back and save the life of President John F. Kennedy.
My family: do I feel supported and cared about by my family, so that whatever stretching I have to do to improve my horsemanship, I have somewhere safe to go home too?
3) Having my morning ration of Cheerios every day.
“Merit.”
Most of these incidents occurred while I was dancing and holding wine. Yes, let's blame my dancing!
Make groups of no more than 5 or 6 people.
Well the rest of the week at work ended up being productive. I met yesterday with the person that was on my graduate committee at school and as I expected, he had a bunch of good ideas for me to try. Always good to know that I didn't do it wrong...
I have heard things today and yesterday that have made me really miffed. So, what better way to vent my feelings than on a blog? Even though no one will probably read this, I am going through with it anyway.
Team Destiny
we hear this a lot.
If an agent ends up controlling world rights, then it is the agent’s responsibility to shop them around the world. Most U.S. literary agents engage co-agents based in the major bookbuying countries of the world; once they sell a book for which they have retained world rights, they will contact all of their agents, let them know of the sale, and ask them if they would like to represent the book in their territory. If particular co-agents in particular countries don’t feel that the book would be successful in their country, then there is not much the primary agent can do; but the primary agent must at least query these co-agents and try.
Leads to death,
Here's the full list:
Strawberry Shortcake is your typical bubblegum pink. Lollipop is more of a magenta pink. Raspberry pie is the most pigmented of the 8 that I own. It's a beautiful Raspberry, very close to the Colorburst Raspberry, which is one of my staple lip colors. Tutti Frutti is a super fun coral orange. This is the most sheer of the 8 Lip Butters I currently have.
hint...hint!
Well…..today I am off the fence. I want a Hearing Dog. Why? Because I was playing on my laptop whilst still thinking about whether to get up or not, and I had my buzzy alarm thing with me to alert me should the front doorbell go as I was expecting a parcel from Amazon.
This particular morning Teddy brought into my bed her newest teddy bear (Bernie Bear) and wriggled up close. Bernie Bear's silky soft fur was tickling my nose, so I grabbed it and hugged it tight.
So before the Halloween mayhem begins, I managed to steal time to spend with bee.
Sometimes my Husband works late, so I get to make the most of my extra time working up there.
1. Plant It!
I’ve also noticed lately that journalists and many authors are fond of using the repulsive term, “White Supremacist Apartheid Regime” in their writings when referring to South Africa’s recent past. Vocal reports on the radio and television often place undue emphasize on the last four syllables of the word ‘apartheid’, and pronounce it as “HATE”. This subtle but deliberate misrepresentation is particularly loved by foreign press reporters, and is fast becoming popular among a few local Black South Africans, who seem to have fallen into the habit of imitating everything the Americans do.
“This is grain, which any fool can eat, but for which the Lord intended a more divine means of consumption – Beer!” – Robin Hood, Prince of Thieves, Friar Tuck
And, from the above—the open invitation to new authors comes with no qualification that they may have to contribute financially to the publication of their book.
We are in the middle of trying to finance an adoption. We cannot afford this. I don't know what to do. I HAVE to repair the hernia. I can't get it repaired without moving the band. I am stuck.
**and with my job...
The lights in his house came back on and he saw his male patient staring up at him with a naked grin. “Daniel, what are you doing?” He was disgusted and disappointed because he thought he had her back. “How did you do that?”
But feel the strange heart beating where it lies?
Key Players: Wes Eikmeier (15.6 ppg), Dorian Green (13.5 ppg), Greg Smith (9.7 ppg, 5.3 rpg), Pierce Hornung (8.7 ppg, 8.4 rpg), Will Bell (8.4 ppg)
my three favorite people.
I can honestly tell you I have NEVER experienced the glory of God as most people claim to have. I can’t remember myself THANKING GOD for anything because I’ve never felt as if there was this all powerful being watching over me and providing me with food, shelter, and many other things on a daily basis. This concept of “the power of prayer” has never felt so personal and meaningful to me, so I was never compelled to say “Thank the Lord, you have answered my prayer!” Is there a God that watches over me? I DON’T KNOW! I’ve never felt this invisible presence in my life by a being that has never been proven to exist. Thus lies the conundrum for me on this Easter Sunday…I’m not quite sure what this day means for me.
to slow the clock
A feisty Malaysian woman went to extremes when her purse was snatched by a motorcycle-riding thief. But she wasn't giving up her prized possession so easily. She gave chase on her own motorbike!
So, what should you do to make sure that your hair stays healthy, shiny and strong?
Thus did this particular young lady introduce herself in her NaNoWriMo author bio. Even so, it was several weeks before I thought to call her Tirzah, referring to her instead by the fond epithet SlytherinFox.
They were coming out in rhyming couplets and rhythmic quatrains.
Cryptographer and security guru Bruce Schneier coined (as far as I know) the phrase “security theater” (well, he is American), and many people apply the phrase to airport security. I think he means security measures that don’t actually add significant security (and may even reduce it), but make us feel safer. To put it crudely, we may feel that since airport security restrictions are so inconvenient to us, they must be inconveniencing terrorists and criminals too. I suppose they may reduce the risk from shoe bombs, but even I can think of ways to smuggle a significant threat onto a plane in less than 100 ml of liquid, and I’m fairly sure it’s possible to turn a laptop into a weapon without leaving traces that can be picked up by a cotton bud. Here’s a classic example from 2001: just after the attack on the Twin Towers, the UK government forbade aircraft to fly directly over London. Obviously, air controllers and pilots did as they were told. However, would a modern-day Guy Fawkes have been deterred from making a kamikaze attack on the Houses of Parliament or the City of London? Of course he would. Just as surely as sheep are deterred from grazing by “Keep off the grass” signs.
I would like to give the following blogs a very big HUG for their insight, encouragement, and wisdom. Each of these bloggers make the writing process beyond enjoyable, and they all provide us with the gift of their blog, and for that, I could not be more thankful.
To look at thee unlocks a warmer clime;
Monday: Braised pork belly. Tuesday: Braised pork shoulder. Wednesday: Barbecued pork ribs. If he had prepared pig trotters on Thursday, I was going to start ransacking the house looking for the pig carcass he was obviously hiding.
I've been bored for the last few years. Food choices, retail shopping choices, entertainment options. All those categories I have started to grow tired of going to the same god damn place. If we can't decide on a good restaurant to go out to, we go to Fridays. It's good, but I'm bored. If we can't find it at Wal-Mart or Target, we don't seem to buy it. If it's not playing at a local regal cinemas, it seems that we don't go.
The movie is about entertainment industry that “produce” idol groups. The story follows a manager/producer of a boyband called Mr. Children, Oh Gu Ju. There were tragic accident that cost the life of the vocalist. This incident affects her and the boyband.
I have developed PTSD from that footwear. Think of the scene in Rainman when Raymond panics at the hot water running in the tub: "Very bad! Very bad! Water burn baby!" Same thing for me, only my internal reaction at the sight of any high-heeled platform or wedgie-style shoe:
Laura wore a dress she got from Modcloth, which just happened to look like it was made specifically to go with her adorable pair of pink and brown John Fluevog shoes. She topped it off with a vintage mink stole she found at an estate sale. Fawn went for a classic secretary look complete with pencil skirt and cardigan, pairing it with a vintage hat that I retrimmed myself. I wore my vintage 50's dress and a vintage fur-trimmed hat I found at Goodwill.
The other nominees don’t come close to matching either of the aforementioned shorts - Lavatory Lovestory (2007, Russian) is cute, but didn’t really do much for me, and certainly didn’t innovate as far as animated style is concerned. The British submission, This Way Up (2008) was technically strong and admirably cheeky, but went a bit nuts in the finale. I found the slight (three minutes) Oktapodi (2007, French) terribly funny, and a good example of how Pixar’s computer-generated animation style has come to define the genre, but it didn’t have nearly enough heft to do much more than produce giggles. I just like animated octopods.
Alternatively, and perhaps more enjoyably for you and your readers, you can focus on real atheist-skeptic communities, portraying them as either monolithic or riven by conflict. In the unified variant, the community is white, male, very old or young, right wing, and sexist/racist. The lack of norms is a distinguishing feature. There are few women or minorities, especially in leadership roles, and they are not respected. This is of course specific to gnu atheism and religion, and due to the exact same causes. Respected atheist women, minorities, and leftists in leadership roles have spoken eloquently about representation. Using quotations from them about their nonexistence is fine, as long as it’s done with a delicate and subtle touch. In the conflict version, disagreements over politics, tactics, or representation are acrimonious Deep Rifts. Deep rifts sell!
First and foremost, thanks for being part of the Liz Norris Pay It Forward Debut Novel contest.
For those simple gestures of love,
Gone is Angelo Dundee his mentor and father figure; Joe Frazier passing a few months ago who took him to his athletic limits time and time again and the “Mouth that Roared” Howard Cosell who built a career in the verbal sparing ring with the fighter.
Potter
At 6:55, we're heading to the hospital, a cooler packed with cow's milk, soy milk, juice, soy yogurt, apple sauce and other foods, my laptop, assorted toys, and the diaper bag fill the car.
Turning the vibrator on low, she lightly ran it over her nipples, moaning at the sensations as they stiffened into tight peaks. Moving it down her body, she slid it up between her lips, teasing her moist hole with the tip. Her audience watched, enraptured by her facial expressions as she slowly inserted it inch by inch, only to withdraw it just as slowly. Tony approached her, kneeling in front of her, massaging her thighs, his faces inches from the action. His head bobbed in closer with every thrust, his tongue flicking out to lick her lips.
Multidisciplinary treatment combining graded exercise therapy (GET) cognitive behavioural therapy (CBT) and pharmacological treatment has shown only short-term improvements.
The lamb weighs about 13 kilograms with Simon guessing its age at just under two years old. It's come from Cowra, sourced from Breakout River Meats with animals grazing along the banks of the Lachlan River.
9) My bin at work hasn’t been emptied. The shells from yesterday’s pistachios are still there staring up at me. How am I supposed to operate in these kind of conditions? Now I know how those blokes who sort rubbish at the tip must feel every day.
- A passion for fashion and creating the worlds warmest boots
PUTAR: It has been said that it is the China-driven boom that is responsible for rocketing Australians from 15th place in the world in terms of GDP per capita in 1992 to seventh.
Here is the US government claiming it can Constitutionally assassinate Americans upon the non-reviewable dictate of the leader, as these criminals take psychopathic steps to murder Americans who expose their crimes.
3. Ghostbusters - Ray Parker Jr.
I am also thankful for:
And finally, I was really looking forward to hanging these two prints in our entryway above the coatrack, but I didn't have the necessary hardware to do so (it would have been too hard using the wire and trying to get them exactly lined up to each other... we'd probably have 40 holes in the wall trying to get it right). So tomorrow after work I'll have to stop by Home Depot to grab some picture frame hooks. But I snapped shots of them anyway:
I started off by staying in my comfort zone. I was thinking fables, a short book for younger readers, nothing too big or ambitious. Then something happened and I realised that playing safe was not an option if I ever wanted to get anywhere with my writing. I had to try to write the sort of book I actually wanted to read. I knew I had the germ of a good idea and I didn’t want to waste it.
I had a request for this Matt Dennis LP, which I am particularly happy to provide at this time because it contains two seasonal songs.
& of course a new Cardigan and a Top :)
All in all, this is a good wine. I would definitely suggest pairing it with food or something to nibble on.
I can’t afford to replace my laptop because the increasingly insanely detailed contracts my agent is having to deal with, often including all-in format deals for outlines that are just a couple of pages long, mean that although the money is definitely there, my relationship to it is worryingly similar to that of a Dickensian urchin to his inheritance.
She was surprised to find her two dark cousins had abandoned their hunt, and flew past the break in the wall towards the exit. Her bare feet splashed through the trickling water as she returned down the hall towards the exit. No longer the hunted, Sharia raised her blade in anticipation. She heard sounds of conflict ahead and dashed into the rock salt vault to see the pair of shades attacking their erstwhile allies. They each had a steel dagger and were passing a pot of wine between them as they backed the over-matched and terrified warriors into a corner.
Friends: badasses
Why all this matters is that in 2010 there was a national election in Burma, after which the new president instituted some political reforms which the military realized it had no choice but to allow. As a result, the NLD participated in the elections held on April 1. It was the first time in years the group had done so, regarding previous elections as shams.
But it is Bo Guagua who stands out among the younger princelings. No other child of a serving Politburo member has ever had such a high profile, both at home and abroad.
And because I’ve really enjoyed watching their specials on TV.
Express the desire to be the opposite sex
It began with her boast
One evening after programs, Gail and our children were at the building waiting for me to return with the van after dropping off children in the neighborhood. When I returned Gail was excited and a little shook up. She had watched a drama in our sprawling overgrown neglected parking lot behind the corps building. The lot was surrounded by old rusting wire fence. It made for a very effective World War I battlefield. That fence had trapped two heshes trying to escape some young white guy driving an SUV trying to run them over. Gail said it was horrifying and hilarious. Here were two creatures running for their lives best they could in high heels, dresses (very revealing dresses), wigs, makeup. Heshes were always, shall I say slender. Could fool you for a moment at least into thinking, yes, they could walk down the fashion runway. But now two were frantically running from one side of Verdun to the other, looking for an opening in the fence to get away.
Psalm 113:9 niv
"Those concerns, and a growing consensus among scholars that many high school graduates 'can't write well enough to get a passing grade from a professor on a paper,' drove the addition of a third section to the SAT, upending decades of balance between reading and math, said Ed Hardin, a content specialist at the College Board.
"He that breaks a thing to find out what it is has left the path of wisdom."
I was sooo excited when Pam, her mom and also a friend, requested this cake because I know it will be something girly and cute. Until she suggested this cake idea, the one she found from the internet. It’s a beautiful cake but with detailed decoration. Honestly, I don’t know how to execute it LOL Initially, I thought of getting photos of Lalaloopsy then print it in edible paper. It will make my life a lot easier! But I wasn’t sure if they (the baking supplies store here) will allow it to be printed due to copyright issues. The 2nd option was to make the 3d fondant dolls. Not a good idea *lol* and not enough time. So, I had no choice but to do free-hand cut. I hope I did justice with the dolls *lol*
Even if it were an achievable goal, to make sure all students actually learned and retained everything they were taught in school, and could all end up with the same base of knowledge, would it be a desirable goal? Why do we want everyone to know the same things? To think the same way? Some people think a goal of education is to produce creative, innovative individuals. If this is true, then it is difficult to see how the train model would get us there. Is it possible to encourage students to think creatively while insisting that there is only one right path to follow?
What fresh sophistry is this? Free speech makes us less free? This is the rhetoric of every totalitarian—that "true" freedom comes from restricting freedom. That speech should be free unless the government doesn't like what is being said.
These lilies were sent for the funeral of my mother-in-law last fall. They were beautiful and lasted quite a long time after the service.
UniSource Energy Corporation, Alternative Energy, Deals Summary, 2006 to YTD 2012 8
I simply do not understand how anybody can justify changing a system that is straightforward and effective to one that requires hundreds of people and untold thousands of pounds to set up and results in an entire workforce grinding to a halt for large chunks of their day. A more cynical man than I might think they were making the whole process this difficult so that nobody would bother claiming their own money back, saving the company the expense of repaying them. But I am clearly not cynical by nature so can only presume that they know best. Perhaps it is a government scheme to create employment for would be accountants. There are probably thousands of people across the country with no social skills and greasy hair who like sitting in stale smelling rooms with ‘You don’t have to be mad to work here, but it helps’ posters on the walls who need a purpose. For this reason we have no choice but to welcome this pointless program into our lives in the knowledge that it is creating employment for a whole swathe of people who would otherwise be watching Jeremy Kyle and experimenting with biscuits.
And maybe the best thing of all - last week I only went to the grocery store one time during the week and that was just to pick up milk and diapers! It usually feels as though we are there everyday normally. Let's just say our bank account is certainly thankful for Make 5 Dinners in 1 Hour!
Thanks to BBC On This Day, Today in History and Filipiniana.NET.
Second, a lovely event scheduled for 6 pm on Saturday evening, showing how winning a Bridport Prize can lead to amazing things – my chance to compere an event – to interview colleagues who have gone on to be published, and to invite them to read their work. Judith Allnatt read to us from her second novel, the rather brilliant ‘The Poet’s Wife’ – about Patty, wife of John Clare. And short story writer Adam Marek, author of ‘Instruction Manual for Swallowing’ (Comma Press) read a new short story. I read from The Coward’s Tale. Q and A followed.
It's been busy and rough week with a few doctor's appointments for Brad and I, some yard work, housework, migraines and dealing with the dreadful heat.
Q084) “I’m glad I’m in 2NE1~”, when do you think like that?
Armistice Day saw the legal end to World War I on November 11, 1918. Two soldiers from opposing sides crawled out of their trenches on that memorable day...my Grandfather, Private John T Baker...and Corporal Adolf Hitler. John T would return home to marry Edna and guarantee that I would see the light of day. Adolph returned to Germany to sow the seeds for the next great war.
writing quietly about their afterworld,
Lydia *******
he hated for
Q045) What would you like to try if you’d be allowed to do it? (T/N: In other words – If you were allowed to do anything, what would you do?”
I cannot believe it; the sun actually came out today for an hour or two and I had the unique opportunity to take some blog photos without digging out my light box! So now for something completely different... I just wanted to quickly show you how I've been trying to shop my make-up stash recently, maybe that'll be somewhat inspiring? If not, there are pretty boxes to look at further down and also some Valentine's Day info for local readers :)
Jordan Casey (12) from Waterford has become Europe’s youngest iOS app developer after launching his new game Alien Ball Vs Humans on the App Store – just months after Harry Moran from Cork became the world’s youngest Mac app developer.
Isa 48:16: Come ye near unto me, hear ye this; I have not spoken in secret from the beginning; from the time that it was, there am I: and now the Lord GOD, and his Spirit, hath sent me.
At the end of the ramparts on Bastion Sainte-Jaume is a sculpture called La Grande Nomade by Jaume Plensa. It depicts an enormous man sitting, holding his knees to his chest while looking out to sea.
Every veterinary hospital in Tucson has one, it’s called the treatment room, and it is usually a catch-all location with several tables equipped for anything from nail trims to minor surgeries. The walls are usually lined with kennels for recovering surgical or hospitalized patients. This room is the heart of the hospital. Any time a pet needs to have blood drawn, a nail trim, or even a major cactus removal, they are often hustled into this room.
It won’t solve all of our country’s woes. And it might even create a few of them, when you’re factoring in that the budget for congressional staffing will literally double, and renovations will be needed at the capitol building to support all of the people who will now have a seat there (and in times of a deficit, that’s not the most fiscally responsible thing to do, I concede).
Third, I happened to be medication-sensitive and could not take the SSRI's usually prescribed for depression and panic attacks, so my doctor tried sedatives. The only one I could tolerate was alprazolam. It did not stop my panic attacks, but it did enable me to sit down and focus on Bible studies, and it slowed my racing thoughts so that I could put a grocery list together without crying. My mind was a complete mess back in those days.
They say a picture is worth a thousand words, and in this instance, it truly became that, and so much more. IN that moment, it was my ignorance, and not my student’s, that had been exposed—my assumption that this girl wouldn’t be able to fathom how to bring the world into view for someone who couldn’t see it.
This must make Mr Andrew Neather feel a tad foolish. His proud boast that by importing the Third World Labour would “rub the noses of the right in diversity” appears to have backfired pretty spectacularly.
Alyena Mohummadally and her partner Catherine Roberts are practising lawyers, ostensibly from different sides of a prominent ethnic divide—Alyena is a Pakistani Australian who inspired Catherine to investigate her own Jewish ancestry.
Kenneth Heuer, lecturer at the Hayden Planetarium in New York City and author of the book Men of Other Planets, tells how a Mercurian might look.
A fog horn sounds in the distance as a stranger tips his hat and nods with a wink. There is a cabby who stops and lets you cross the street and the smell of fish and chips, the best on earth, pulls you from your reverie.
I am a very lucky man. I haven’t really figured out my life (welcome to 28 in 2011!), but I have the support I need to feel at home and loved. I have the skill and education to make the most of the opportunities that exist, even in this horrible economy. I have been part of a strong community here, and, knowing how important community is to me, will make building a new one a top priority in my new home.
But My Creative Future can be helpful to everyone who either want to change careers, who don’t know what they want to do, careers advisers in schools and Colleges, parents; just about anyone interested in creative careers, education, news and updates and more.
* After I made the legs, I used Beth Webber’s method of crocheting the legs and continuing with the body rather than closing the body cavity and sewing the legs on.
kneydlekh (קניידלעך)
4. License plate numbers
“there have only been 16 months since 1939″ in which the economy added half a million jobs in one month.
solid as stone towers
But it is SO worth it to have a view like this!
sydney rose, cooper, caroline (making a break for it)
I’m sure you have weeks on your calendar that look like that, too, an overload of busyness, and you hold your breath in anticipation of it, stress when you think about it, and dream about making it through.
So don't forget to check out the new stickers posted.
We are enslaved in a prison with no visible bars
Durrani said Younus’ case should be a reminder that the Pakistani government needs to do much more to prevent acid attacks and other forms of violence against women, and also help the victims.
1 heaved
again….and again…and again….
我们认为，火花迎合彗星的火焰
and see his cancer-stricken 90-year-old mother. The government hasn’t
Ow my… I feel so low so deep inside. My energy is so low… I am going on but I am not feeling strong. I sleep about 5 hours a night. I have nightmares. I sleep but I don’t really feel rested when I have to get up again.
Here are all of the delicious Dusty items I have used...
Big Rock Ridge begins off Lucas Valley Road at a huge boulder landmark. The big rock? We hiked it as an out and back but there are a couple shuttle options. Theresa, Maynard, Suzanne and I (and Rasa, Suzanne’s uber-sweet dog) set off. Find the tower on the right ridge-line in the photo below. That’s the high point and where we stopped for a snack/gawk break.
We'll also be seeing a 1922 epic from Germany, The Loves of the Pharaoh. The restoration on this looks gorgeous!
When I first heard Bolero, I was at the age where whatever my mom thought, I thought as well. I remember looking at the Sears catalog with Mom once (remember those honking huge catalogs, the stuff of dreams and visions and uplift for short guests at the dinner table?) and every dress that she liked, I liked. I remember echoing her views about the dresses, and my sister saying scornfully, “You only like that because Mom likes it.”
Therefore: the battle at Ncome River MUST be viewed in proper context.
One of the most radical messages of Beyond Good and Evil which is still not appreciated by most, as far as I can tell, is this: ‘It is no more than a moral prejudice that truth is worth more than mere appearance; it is even the worst proved assumption there is in the world.‘ Imagine, if you can, an answer to the child who, looking up at you with oversized eyes asks, “But why? Why does it matter what the truth is if we both agree that it seems something else?” This the domain where the ‘bourgeois trope’ “Just Because” comes into its own, we see the appeal of its lure for childish thinkers. N- reminds us repeatedly in this work that philosophy has not discovered a ‘proof’ for to answer, “But why the truth and not the error?” which transcends the level of the ‘because’.
I really messed up the other day. I was tired. I was trying to focus on college work. The boys were hyped up from a church event. I was trying to get them to bed, but they would have no part of it - they were running, yelling, and laughing. To top it all off, our almost 13 year old Yorkie walked into the living room and decided to take a potty break on our area rug.
Angels 7 11 1 4
Object-oriented programming (OOP) in PHP is pretty much the same as in Java, with the classes and objects, methods, and inheritance.
See, sick babies like to snuggle. The sicker they are, the more they feel that the best place on earth is within six inches of mommy’s face. It took a while to learn the warning signs and then it took a while longer to hold on to my presence of mind long enough to grab a container.
I have a question for you garden experts (like Heather): What is this seedling? I think I planted it, because they're only growing in the area around my tree where I threw some seeds one year. But I don't remember what all I planted. I know there were violets and poppies and something else. Maybe cosmos? These just look too much like weeds to me, so last year I pulled them all out. I guess I didn't take a picture of this garden bed...it also needs help since we enlarged it last year to acccomodate the weeping caragana that Kevin wanted.
School trips are always a delicate balance between keeping the children entertained and finding a day out that is suitably educational to be worth the trip.
Although sweet clover does not have any identified interactions, prescription drugs containing coumarin have been known to interact adversely with other prescription drugs, especially blood thinners, aspirin, and heart medications. Persons taking prescription drugs of any type should check with their physicians before begining a regimen of sweet clover.
Oh, and by the way, now I am at work, running my own shop and trying to finish a bunch of sewing...
That is the true Gospel.
HP: Which of your books would you recommend for my readers to start with?
And, there's a science fiction aspect that also adds to the intrigue. I didn't think the "sinister plot" alluded to in the blurb was really unique or even all that sinister. However, the ending did get my heart pounding a bit. Most of my problems with Revived are pretty nit-picky things about the whole scientific plot. Why would they be testing a drug for over ten years, and still not have it available to more people? Why did Daisy die so many times (how unlucky!) A possible explanation was given at the end, but still, kind of unlikely. Why would she open up to Matt so soon. I know she liked the guy, but she had kept this secret for so long, why make such a quick decision?
No more footie pajamas
The fabric I picked is a dark purple linen
i was on top of the world in 2010 - no complaints till November struck, BAMN, everything changed - it's almost 2011 my butterflies and i'm excited !! - excited for a new year, new adventures, new journeys, new friends, new recipes, new endeavours, new junctures, ect.
I pulled up to the front of the store, handed him some money, and told him what kind of milk I wanted him to get.
Our bangles will also be available at selected artisan markets in Queensland soon.
December 15
about 1 tbsp Sichuan peppercorns, rinsed and drained**
A note on the weather: Before the start it was pleasant. Probably too warm for running but given that we stood there for 30+ minutes it was comfortable. As soon as we started running, it was HOT. There was NO wind. My God, I live in Oklahoma, it’s windy as hell and there is NO wind? How? Why?
Atheist: Let me tell step by step what took place according to evolution.
This morning’s ride was great. I love it that inside ten minutes I can be on a rural road that may as well be 100km from a town.
I laughed at the thought of using all three in my speech. Seriously, what does a coffee cup, a tree, and kindness have in common? And then it came to me as if an Angel had delivered it straight to me neatly tied in a beautiful blue bow.
I set up 5 stations that the students will take their moms through. If you have a student whose mom can't come, enlist an aid or the secretary, or simply have them bring in a grandmother or other special lady in their life!
Summers: grrrrr
Of course this is just a short list of crazy celebrity baby names! Rest assured, though. There are celebrities who actually name their child normally. Case in point, Freddie Prinze, Jr., and Sarah Michelle Gellar’s Charlotte Rose.
the place was locked up tight and there was also a locked gate at the entrance.
DR EVIL: Doctor! Doctor! Over here please, just a few words… Now, you’re not up for an award yourself tonight, so you can be honest, who’s the best?
I have begun exploring options for after this program ends, specifically for returning to Costa Rica for either volunteering or work. I have reached out to the women that was offering the other internship that I was interested in and she has responded saying there are projects. We are going to set up a meeting when I return to Monteverde to discuss potential projects for January or so. I have also talked to Karen, our primary professor here, about the potential of being their Teacher Assistant next semester if they have 20 students again (then they have two). She said that she will consider it and whatever needs to happen will happen. Though I think being a TA would be a very interesting and
really wish i had the patience for meal planning.
_____I suppose one day I'll fall in love again, but I'm just too emotionally stable for that right now. (funny love quote)
Man U is so popular, even I have a ManU jersey before I even watched my first soccer game. One Man U dude even had a vuvuzela. I'm just glad we picked up a sixer of Negra Modelo for some poorman's tailgating just before the game. Although it was great to see a crowd of over 70,000, I just hope we get more attendance at Dynamo games point forward.
And then I have to take at least one bath a week (I hate baths!!!!!!!!) Showers are so quick and easy, baths... ugh.. At this point I just looked at her and burst out "Ah come on!!" I thought the smear test was a difficult enough task.. baths too? But she was very firm.. So I mumbled something about throwing me in the deep end while we at it and she snapped back "Baths don't have one just so you know". No, there's no arguing with her when she's made her mind up. So I sat there thinking.. how could I get away with it the easiest way. At this point I think she knows me so well though because before I had a chance to say anything she said "And by the way, I don't talk about 5 minute baths here. You have to make them last. Bring in a book and read. Even a glass of wine." Yep... I'd been thinking, fill up the bathtub, get in, get out!
So now,we come to 2012, where the US, desperate to hold on to it illusion of wealth, in a bankrupt, de-industrialized land of massive poverty and unemployment. To do so, to have any chance of kicking the can of responsibility further down the road of history, the US must destroy any threat to the Dollar. It did this in its invasion of Iraq, in its bombing of Libya. Even as its empire collapsed under the strain of insane debts and more and more nations started using their own currencies between each other, the US lashed out diplomatically, economically and militarily, like a spoiled and enraged child.
Okayyy, let's see here. All the bands I'm thinking of have pretty crappy first records too. Led Zeppelin's first record, which I think they recorded maybe a year after being together, is pretty fucking impressive. Look at Minor Threat's early records. They came out of the gate and it was like, bang! Black Flag is a really important band to me, and they took a long time to get up to full speed. I like the post-hardcore stuff. I like their metal stuff, basically.
In this one, I stamped vellum flowers using the coordinating Card Word Puzzle set. I love the look of the flowers on the vellum.
Well, my three days off are coming to a close – it is already almost 7pm. Had coffee with my son then came back home – did a few things and am not settling in to watch tv. Haven’t decided if I will eat anything more tonight but since all I had was soup today, I suppose I should think about it. Maybe I’ll make a hamburger helper so I’ll have leftovers for tomorrow at work. I need to get 2 lbs of hamburger so I can make meatloaf again – and more ketchup.
"If you accidentally swallow more than used for brushing, seek professional help or contact a poison control center immediately."
Pearls: Gift
beneath the wake -
Spent an afternoon floating in the pool and enjoying a beer. It was so relaxing. Basically, my summertime equivalent of a hot bath in the winter.
Mo
U.S. and British officials were deeply suspicious of this outfit, observing that the AASF – though backed by singer Harry Belafonte and actor Sidney Poitier – had links to a Kenyan nationalist leader.
Suddenly, she noticed her hands that hadn’t moved for years were lifted up.
18 years later I've got a sophmore at Permian, but I ain't all MOJO'd up. I've been to but one single game in all my Odessa years, and that was because they were matched up against my ol' alma mater of Copperas Cove, themselves a powerhouse in recent years.
This celebrity status is thirsty work.
Cleanup is underway and the front yard is clear. Now the back will get our attention. As much as I hate leaf blowers, I have to say using one is much faster and easier then raking. A neighbor who has a yard service is going to chip all our limbs and leave me the chips.
The Eggs Benedict were a group effort. We toasted the English Muffins by putting them under the broiler for 2 minutes then added the Canadian Bacon and broiled for 1 minute.
4. Black Sheep - Similak Child
But for us to remember that it isn’t those actual conditions, circumstances or interactions that lead to a sense of “less happy”…..it’s our own reactions…often repetitive reaction patterns… and resistance, within us, that generates that feeling….
Then, a few days went by and I noticed the paint was chipping off of the trim really easily. I was sure this was because I decided to skip the sanding step. I decided it was too late to turn back, so I just touched up the marks as they occurred. And what I realized down the line is that it just took time for the paint to actually harden and cure. Now, it's much much more durable and doesn't nick much at all. And if/when it does, it's still so easy to just touch it up as needed.
COPIC MARKERS - B24, FV2, YR07, Y19, YG11 AND YG07
So you would say, rather that without God there is no basis for morality, without God there would be no morality, period. So all secular or differently religious ethical systems that lead to goodness are ultimately God's doing.
Answer 3: There is no enforcement language whatsoever for the Bill of Rights. Any prohibition without enforcement is merely a suggestion. Or propaganda, depending on your point of view. And so …
And pass on the message I leave here tonight
I re-wrote and went on an Arvon course about the second draft, during which the tutors – an established novelist and an editor – suggested some more structural changes. I made those, and then a friend gave the manuscript to an agent friend of hers, and she took me out to lunch and I thought ‘Whoopee – I’m in!’ And she liked it. But again, she felt it needed another rewrite. By the time I’d done that, her list was full. Then I booked my ticket to York Festival...
“I got an idea,” he tossed back at her over his shoulder. “You worry about your hat and gloves, and I’ll take care of getting you to JFK.”
Remember: the 1-5 system is not analogous to the A-F grading scheme in school; most employees will get the middle rank, a 3. This might leave some employees feeling let down, thinking they’re merely “average.” Don’t cave in. “In the corporate world, you’re dealing with a highly selective group,” says Grote. “The rules of the game have changed. In school, a C was mediocre, but a 3 in the working world means they’re meeting expectations. They’re shooting par.” Conveying that message is a leadership challenge. “People can accept it rationally but it may be hard to accept viscerally,” he says. “This is why it’s so important to hold a performance planning meeting at the outset. If they hit their targets, they are a 3. It’s a goal.”
* If you'd like to receive posts form this blog directly into your Facebook news feed, you could make it so by *liking* its Facebook page.
Some people love my wedding blog... some don't let me live it down. I think a couple of people even stalk me on it. I didn't know what was going to come of having a wedding blog, and really didn't imagine I would keep at it. I can honestly say, however, that I am quite pleased at my decision to maintain my blog, and can't wait until I'm in the thick of planning so I have more details to write about! I am going to start having some weekly highlights/spotlights, but until May 8th, my hands are pretty tied from wedding planning. That is just the nature of planning a wedding with Disney. Without this blog, I doubt I'd even feel engaged except for the ring on my finger! In fact, I will go as far as to recommend blogging to all my engaged and future engaged friends! Why not?!?! So, without further ado, here are my top ten reasons to keep a wedding blog!
I want to keep learning in my job. Learning is not just for kids.
Charumbira became sick and died. After his death all the vaShawasha were called together. They came to discuss the chieftainship of Chinamora. They agreed that the chieftainship should be given to Chingoma, the first born of Chidziva.
This is not going the way anybody expected is it?
166A death-like silence, and a dread repose:
These pillow covers are seriously so simple to make. The first thing that I did was measure the pillows that I wanted to cover; I measured top to bottom, then side to side, starting from the seam on one end and going to the seam on the other end.
The plastic bins at the bottom of the closet are still in use, however. They now contain only our snow and ski stuff. It not every day that you need to break out snow pants or ski goggles - so I didn't mind that those were kept slightly out of the way.
“Guys let’s be rational. This is our only way of getting out safely. Let her help us.” said Steve.
I found a few, as well as some interesting knitting books, so I took them to a desk and sat down to have a browse through them.
To that end, we must decide. Not once, not weekly, not daily, not even every hour…….but every second; we must choose to place our hope and faith in Christ. We must believe that God is still active and moving in this world. We must expect Him to move in our lives every day. Don’t ask or wonder if God is going to move today……no, expect Him to move and be watching for it.
Reed states the workshop is being held at Haskell U. because of the high level of talent in their theater department. Reed has made an excellent choice in Haskell to represent the Native American in film and TV, as Haskell has a fascinating history of its own.
Johnson EM, Newman LM, Gabel BEG, Boerner TF, Dansky LA. An analysis of the hydra assay’s applicability and reliability as a developmental toxicity prescreen. J Am Coll Toxicol 1988; 7: 111-126.
Mustn't fall over in a Sherim. A step that was half a leap got him his balance back, but the ground stayed unsteady and strange. Taslin shouted Dora's name. She hadn't planned this, then. Or she had, but she still needed his trust for something. Getting through the Sherim?
There is no right or wrong way to apply the products above however, using the principals I've outlined will give you the desired result.
The reports also raise questions as to whether or not Australian forces have also been used illegally in Pakistan, Yemen and Somalia. As for SAS activities inside Kenya and Nigeria, they would almost certainly have been conducted in joint operations with US and British forces. The sources state that intelligence gathered by 4 Squadron “all flows into databases used by the United States and its allies in Africa.”
should get out more..
A. Yes, yes I will.
I do not read as many blogs as I used to….not because I do not think they are still great (they are) but because the authors are going in a different direction than me and I am not at a point where I am ready to read and be thrilled over new beginnings with other people; I am not a point where I am ready to take advice from the women who have landed their dream men or the chick who got the guy (and married him) after he left the other chick because the other chick was not his one…this chick is.. I am not ready to read all about newlywed bliss or first holidays or vacations with the incredibly wonderful guy who came after the one who broke hearts. I am still processing and not completely over the last guy and any new beginnings headed my way involve me, myself and I.
"Oh really? Ok then, Can I speak to your manager now?"
i knew if i went kayaking on saturday i could get koichi to look after hana while i went to the art book fair on sunday.i wanted to go last year but i heard the crowds were crazy.
3. Dirty Little Secrets C.J. Omololu
Buttons: TeeshaMoore.com
Best Eggs as Brains Analogy
At the cathedral reception desk we asked about the cat. We learnt that his name was Louis, he was the cathedral cat, and that the minor canon (or some such title) on duty had to put him out at night. No cat-flap, then: does Louis also spend cold nights scratching at the stained-glass windows, mewing to be allowed in?
I believe people will join your church and the Kingdom of God if they know our hearts for Jesus. If they sense we really care about them. If they really deep down see our relationship with Christ shaping and forming our lives, they will want to follow Jesus too! We can’t just add “some” Jesus. Jesus has to be everything!
The Birdcage
However, does anyone know what it is called?
Apply a darker color into the outer crease of your eyelid. This should go all the way to the outermost portion of the crease. Ultra-pigmented, high-impact signature shades with tone-on-tone sparkling pearl that create beautiful dimension for the eye. Long-wearing, crease-resistant colors can be worn for both subtly shimmering and seriously smoky effects. Color glides on smoothly and evenly and blends effortlessly.
Best Nighttime Snack: 1/2 Whole-grain English muffin & 2 Tsp Almond Butter, topped with slices of 1/4 pear. OMG!
OU: A raw, high resolution transfer of this partial recording of the band's first night at Madison Square Garden.
I was driving home after all this happened and I came up with a new strategy. The Brass and detectives want us to frequent this particular bar and make a paper trail. No paper trail, no problem. I will no longer driver pass or enter this bar. I’m also going to pass on the word to my shift and the other night shifts to do the same. One issue that the brass has been having is that this bar has been handling all problems in house and not reporting it to us. If no one reports, no one knows. Also if it can be handled in house then we can be working other more important crimes. I love this idea.
One independent retailer, Ronald "Mac" Walter, who owns two discount furniture stores in Tampa, doubts that the amendment will seriously hurt the job market.
like it in return.
finally!! a project to post!!
September 23, 2011 — Judge Belvin Perry rules Casey Anthony must pay an additional $119,000 for the recalculated costs of the sheriff’s search for Caylee Anthony, for a total of $217,000.
Wow! I just spent 30 minutes trying to get back into my blog. It's all pretty confusing and complicated to me.
The Modern Warfare franchise has been taken to task over the last few years for providing a rip roaring rollercoaster of a ride in it’s single player campaign. The issue most people have with that is that a lot of the game is ‘on-rails’ and linear. Perfect for folks looking to get to grips with their new console.
We have more spare time but less fun.
Would Ombudsman Morales, who is a retired Supreme Court Justice, commit a boo-boo in the performance of her constitutional mandate only to tarnish her exemplary reputation and irrefutable integrity?
after i decided i was going to upload this..i listened to it MANY times and tried to cut it several times...
According to this article, 88 percent of mothers admit they "can’t stop themselves looking down on others who do not do things ‘their way.'" It's not difficult to understand why this might be. It might be because we think there is only one right way, and that obviously, it's our way. Anything that deviates from our way can't be right, because that would make our way wrong.
The quilt was big, like twin size big, so I put the patchwork piece on top of the minky piece, laid it on my kitchen counter and tied it with Perle cotton thread. I started in the middle and worked my way out, and it went better that I thought it would. The next hurdle was the edge, to bind or not to bind? In the end I turned the fabric side under about 1/2 inch, then about 3/4 of an inch, pressed it pinned it over the backing, and then did a decorative stitch on the machine. I knew that this thing was going to get drug/dragged from pillar to post so I didn't go for perfection, and like I said, if she's home, they are as 1 :)
I’ve seen far too many ads saying you should “tweet” 10-20 times each day, or should “friend” everyone on Facebook. I, personally, get tired of having to scroll through message after message about someone’s dog, or what they had for breakfast, or how boring the taxi ride was. I get tired of people who think their sole purpose in my life is to send out more junk for me to read, stuff I have no interest in, just to get their name known. Don’t bother.
It’s hard to decide where to begin. Let’s start by noting that 101 species were seen from the site today. This included 7,328 individuals (2,517 yesterday). Monday and Tuesday were great count days, but seemed to have been leading up to today. The previous best Grube Magnitude Index from the Green Tower site was 67.85. Today, it was blown away with a very impressive 79.04 per Ken Brock. This quantification calculates today’s count as the best ever observed!
Not a day goes by when I don't think of this blog. It sits in the corner of my mind's eye taunting me, lamenting how I neglect it, sobbing that I don't bring it flowers anymore - and you'd have to admit it has a point.
Right now you love acting like you are talking on my phone. You love playing babies. You love music and you love to dance.
The May challenge is to use someone else's blog as your inspiration for the MAY I Challenge. The idea is for you to complete your project by getting inspiration from someone else's blog and then leave a comment at the blog stating that you are using their blog as inspiration for the Scrap Our Stash May
then you’ll be
We put new molding down... just 1x4s... on the top too which we didn't have before. I ordered a new chair from Ikea... one that didn't hide the whole desk and went better with the room (also a cheap purchase compared to others out there).
Tom Pickerell, Senior Science Manager at the Monterey Bay Aquarium, explains that farmed salmon assessments based “on a country level to better reflect regional differences” are soon to be released.
The two are now far in future and have landed on a space station overrun with aliens hovering over an Earth that is shrouded in a polluted cloud and almost completely encircled by dangerous space debris. It seems that the aliens are engaged in strip-mining the Earth of its valuables, but to do so have put most of its population in a sleep from which they do not recover, targeting the children. This part of the story is weirdly under-developed, this near-genocide being somewhat elided in the development ans conclusion of the narrative, though it does set up the explosion that provides a great cliffhanger at the end of the first episode. This separates the Doctor from Steven and Oliver and sees the TARDIS ejected into space to get rid of ballast.
The Coen brothers have been hugely successful in the world of film making. Joel and Ethan Coen have produced hit after hit including Fargo, The Big Lebowski and True Grit (to name but a few). Released in 1991, Barton Fink is a genre defying movie that has since garnered a huge amount of critical praise and still causes discussions to this very day.
And the king of Israel said to Jehoshaphat, “I will disguise myself and go into battle; but you put on your robes.” So the king of Israel disguised himself and went into battle.
The Looking Glass spray paint was a bit interesting to work with. You are supposed to spray the inside of the glass, and the reverse side ends up with the mirror-effect. It takes about 5 coats or so, and dries quickly. You just spray the inside, move it around so it coats the inside of the glass, then let it dry upside down. This didn't work so well for me. I had a lot of trouble getting it to look uniform. I finally just sprayed both the inside and outside of the jar and I liked the results a lot better.
Couple things to remember to keep your happiness.
This is not a travel entry but a response to the film, bearing in mind physical context.
The Oklahoma Teachers Retirement System, which has posted returns of 5.5 percent over the last five years through a mix of stocks and bonds, is putting 10 percent of its fund into private equity and real estate funds.
SCHLESSINGER: -- and not enough sense of humor.
“Despite our nation’s record of progress, and long tradition of extending voting rights – today, a growing number of citizens are worried about the same disparities, divisions, and problems that Dr. King fought throughout his life to address and overcome,” Holder said at an MLK Day event in Columbia, S.C.
~ Theodor Geisel
pallid world
Sure, there are punitive elements to probation and one always hope for self-betterment in prison but from the stand-point of the prosecutor, those seem to be the basics. (I'd thought of adding "community safety" to the prison category but if rehabilitation is achieved, then probation gets us there, too). For a more detailed discussion of probation and its goals, look at last week's post, here.But by undervaluing the "punitive elements to probation," I think prosecutors like Mark may come to over-rely on prison when they think "there has to be some punishment."
Pune based NGOs ‘Sakhi’ and ‘Advait Foundation’ had moved the apex court saying that inter- country adoption has turned into a lucrative business, as adoption agencies are giving undue preference to prospective adoptive parents in foreign countries over Indian couples in need of children.
June 12: I paid a visit to my old elementary school. Some things have changed, but I was surprised at how much remained the same. These hopscotches look exactly the way I remember them.
He treated me like I'm a freaking idiot, I'm 2 1/2 years post op. I KNOW how this works. Yes I've had bumps in the road but I count myself a success, I weigh less than I did when I started.
Canvas CurseKirby Canvas Curse
"Be still and know that I am God." Psalm 46:10
Men, at least in the conservative Christian community, are repeatedly told to guard the hearts of women, to care for the women in their lives, to tend them well, to defend them, and to avoid hurting them whenever possible, and these are things that they should do. However, it seems that women do not get the same message. Many women appear to believe that their role is to be pursued, to be wanted, to be loved, adored, and taken care of. Like the women of Victorian England they are told to, ‘lie there and think of the queen’. I am not one to attribute malice where ignorance is a sufficient explanation, and so I say this: women, it is your responsibility to care for the men in your lives, just as it is their responsibility to care for you.
Preston
If you want to understand why there is so much unemployment in America these days or why Red China has the ability to destroy our financial system, you need to read Peter Navarro’s and Greg Autry’s Death by China: Confronting the Dragon – A Global Call to Action ($25.99, Prentice Hall). No single book that I have read in recent years so clearly describes how Red China has set upon a strategy to dominate manufacturing through currency manipulation and the willful refusal to abide by World Trade Organization rules. Allowed to get away with this by the U.S. and other nations, it is acting in a criminal fashion on so many levels that it boggles the mind. The great service this book performs is to reveal what it is actually doing as opposed to the myth that its 1.3 billion population represents a great new market for the U.S. and others. Quite the contrary, most are so poor they cannot afford the products we export. How bad is it?
I could see it coming, but I'm a Saggitarious! I always keep a glimmer of hope (proof is, I still think we still have a shot at La Liga :-)
And if Democrats had a stack of maps themselves, well, you just didn’t need to know that, the self-appointed media gate-keepers figured.
After another guy came out and I spent a great deal of time waiting for the Port-O-Let....it was time for Steve.
Love more.
“I was impressed with the attention to detail throughout the sale process. True Professionals!
Well, see...Diesel, the boxer? I just brought him home, the day after Christmas. Steven spanked me, and then adjusted and grew to love the little guy.
Service: This has been fun. I've been volunteering with my son's musical theatre making costumes and hats. The show is coming together and looking awesome, and I love getting to be so creative and also having the chance to just sit around with other moms and gab and work communally.
an equation
98. Already Dead
(Sweet Red Wine) Sauce
What it is: Parenting With Grace, 2nd ed. is a parenting book offering theoretical discussion of how attachment parenting meshes with the Catholic faith and practical suggestions for dealing with everyday parenting situations.
Sign in using your Facebook account OR your name and email address.
He is showing you every truth
But, unlike many corporate cube-dwellers, we may have to purchase our health insurance in the open (i.e. costly) market; in 2003 (when I went onto my husband’s plan through his staff job) I was paying $700 a month. It’s now normal to pay $1,000+…adding an overhead of $12,000 pre-tax dollars just to avoid a medical bankruptcy.
The border and swirl dies are Magnolia Doohickeys.
3) Leave a comment telling me how much you love me. (No la, just leave a comment saying you want to enter this giveaway lol) With your TWITTER & FB NAME + EMAIL !
and growing uneasy, but most of you are 100% in your ego at all times
241Alas, no more--methinks we wand'ring go
I pick up, and read, a print newspaper about as often as I eat greasy bacon, which is once a year. Maybe twice.
I also found this Vintage "Orcas Island" souvenir Pennant. I LOVE this! I spent a couple of Summers back in the ahem,,,,,,,6o's at a Camp on Orcas Island...... (One of the largest of the San Juan Island Chain that runs from Washington State into Canadian Waters.....Beautiful!)
It's harder to serendipitously find stick-with-you books when you're shopping online, at least for me. Anyone have any tips?
For those that are new to our challenge... Welcome! We're so happy you've found us.
881 ***D-V/29/1984. “Civil Disobedience and Statesmanship.” Max Planck Institute for International Law, Heidelberg, West Germany. (Incorporated in Item B-5, above, pp. 537-54 (1992).)
In another bowl (Hey, Sister...who's going to wash all these dishes???), whisk together 3 eggs and 1/2 cup sugar...
The excitement to head up there for five days is palpable…at least for me. I am so excited to see everyone and to get some wedding things done and just be in the city near the holidays. It is also the EXACT time we met six years ago, so we couldn’t have planned it any better. I am sure it has something to do with meeting the love of my life at this time of year, but there is nothing like NYC during the winter/holidays. It’s unbeatable. Two more weeks!!!
So we are in a place where some mentally disorder offenders who are ‘sectionable’ are not prosecuted in the public interest when indeed they should be, to ensure that Part III of the Mental Health Act balances risks, assessment and treatment needs. We are also potentially criminalising mentally vulnerable people who are not (quite) ‘sectionable’, when a diversionary-style approach may be the one which best mitigates against future re-offending risks.
would have hurt her physically eventually.
At the end of day 1 after:
and an endless thumping exploded
I wore shoes & accessories by kurt geiger, acne dress and h&m belt
Brazil’s presidential election in October looks less risky to investors than any other in the last quarter of a century and the economy has bounced back after a brief recession due to the global financial crisis, but there are still investment risks to watch in Brazil this year.
Kasper Gram’s security team took Quartermain away to an abandoned warehouse and tied him to a chair, believing him to be a tabloid journalist working for Michael Laugesen.
Happy Saturday, everyone! If you read my last post, you know that this week was pretty much a nightmare schedule-wise for me between teaching, tutoring, grad class, AND working at Loft! Add in a final research project and a school-wide function last night and I was pretty much ready to throw in the towel before the week even began! But, I had some pretty unexpected "rainbows" this week to remind me to always look for the good in every situation, smile through the tiredness, and enjoy the present...even if the near future (aka Summer Break) seems SO much more desireable!
Inori gets Shu into some semi-destroyed building, he whines a bit, Arisa and co. see them because they were hiding in front of a goddamn window, on the way there Arisa’s father blocks them with a limo (how he did he get there?) and kills a bunch of GHQ with swords despite them being highly trained with guns, until the totally inexperienced Arisa shoots him dead. Yes, it’s as silly as it sounds.
Million Short makes it easy to discover sites that just don't make it to the top of the search engine results for whatever reason. Most people don't look beyond page 1 when doing a search and now they don't have to.
Moody’s nose hurt.
We're MOVING! HOORAY! The condo life is over! We're moving into a Pleasant Grove home at the end of this month and we could not be more excited!! We've lived in our condo for two years, and although the payment has been nice, we have not really enjoyed it.
The company is passionate about getting children to read, finding new authors and illustrators, as well as supporting the existing authors on their list. Egmont has also been a frontrunner in ethical publishing, making sure that the paper they use come from ethical sources.
(World Premiere)
Christan: Looking back, has God redeemed any of the brokenness?
After putting together some initial plans in August, Sharon and Abigail began to contact Austen authors from all publishers and the final list of 20 contributors is very impressive:
It said the judgment “has no impact to the business operations of the company” and that it had in place “a strong team of professionals with priority chiefly on protecting the interest of all stakeholders and upholding best standards of service and management practice.”
While there’s nothing technically wrong with the demo, it just didn’t grab me at all. It seems to be a well made and competent game, but it just do anything that stands out to me. One thing I feel the demo did not do a good job at was really selling me on the game. The maps selected felt really restrictive and self-contained instead of giving you a good feel of medieval exploration and adventure which the trailers tried to convey. Hopefully the demo isn’t representative of the final product and Capcom is able to deliver a top notch fantasy RPG. Dragon’s Dogma hits store shelves on May 22 for the Xbox 360 and PS3.
West Virginia closed its polls at 5:30 PM. Romney appears to have won by a wide margin. It was a semi-closed primary. Romney 69.57%. Paul 11.90%. Santorum 11.38%. Gingrich 6.16%. Roemer 1.00%. The at-large state, congressional district, and bonus delegates were directly elected on their candidates’ tickets. West Virginia is a no-allocation state. It has 3 superdelegates (who are party officials and can do whatever they want), 1o bound at-large delegates, 9 bound congressional district delegates, and 9 bound bonus delegates (who are basically the same as at-large delegates). Paul could have done well in this state were it not for the direct election of delegates, as West Virginia was a no-allocation (Paul’s advantage in Indiana) state and was not a winner-take-all state (Paul’s advantage in North Carolina).
They are not Christians, Muslims, Hindus or Animists.
Do I believe that his statement was to be taken literally? Of course not. Roland was simply running his mouth, or better yet his fingers…on Twitter. That is simply what he does. Once again, if you follow Roland on Twitter, you see him jousting with people all day long.
06 Spill the Wine (War) 5:50
The most problematic would have denied benefits to jobless workers without a high school diploma or the equivalent unless they were enrolled in classes leading to same. There’s no such barrier in the final bill.
after sitting too long in the dark. No,
6. Lilies are decorative and fragrant flowers, and are available all year long. Which makes them a great gift designed by themselves or mixed with roses and other high styled flowers.
Yes, I am quite sure a lot of money, time, effort, people went into getting those “kids” to that point. However, for a few lovely moments in time, it was a group of strangers in a restaurant, lifting them up and wishing them well, bathing them in GRACE. It felt wonderful to be apart of something bigger than ourselves.
